      "identifier" : [
         "83542"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "CHRONICLES OF CANADA Edited by George M. Wrong and H. H. Langton In thirty-two volumes 17 TECUMSEH BY ETHEL T. RAYMOND Part V The -Red Man in Canada",
         "THE MEETING OF BROCK AND TECUMSEH From a colour diawing by C. W. Jefferys",
         "TECUMSEH A Chronicle of the last Great Leader of his People BY ETHEL T. RAYMOND TO RO NTO GLASGOW, BROOK \u0026 COMPANY 1915",
         "CoPyright ln ail Cozrntries subscrlbing to the Berne Convyention",
         "TO MY FATHER",
         "CONTENTS Page ITHE BOYHOOD 0F TECUMSEH I-IFH BAPTISM 0F FIRE 20 II.A LEADER AMONG HIS PEOPLE 34 IV. THE PROPHET 45 V. A GIFTED ORATOR 60 VI. THE BATTLE 0F TIPPECANQE 75 VIL. UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG 87 \",I- FIGHTING ON AMERICAN SOIL \"ao IX. THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE 123 XTECUMSEH'S LAST FIGHT 138 BIBLIOGRAPHICAL NOTE15 INDEX15",
         "ILLUSTRATIONS THE MEETING 0F BROCK AND TECUMSEH- 17frontispiece From a colour drawing by C. W. Jefferys. TECUMSEH'S COUNTRY . Facin page z6 Map by Bartholomew. SIR ISAAC BROCK . .1 . , X From an engraving in the John Ross Robertson Collection, Toronto Public Library. THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE . ,, 14 From prints in the John Ross Robertson Collection, Tor onto Public Library. CAPTAIN ROBERT BARCLAY (' OUR FATHER WITH THE ONE ARM') .. , a From the John Ross Robertson Collection, Toronto Public Library.",
         "CHAPTER I THE BOYHOOD 0F TECUMSEH THREE Indian figures stand out in bold relief Onl the background of Canadian history-the figures of Pontiac, Brant, and Tecumseh. The Ottawa chief Pontiac was the friend of the Ivre 'ýh, and, when the French suffered defeat, lie plotted and fought to drive the English frotn the Indian country. Brant, the Mohawk, t0ok the king's side against the Americans in the War of Independence, and finally led his clef eated people to Canada that they might have homes on British soul. And Tecumseh threw in his lot with the British in the War of 1812 and gave his life in their service. But, While Pontiac fought for the French and Brant and Tecumseh for the British, it was for the lost cause of their own people that al three were really fighting; and it was for this that they spent themselves in vain. Tecumseh, whose story we are to tell in",
         "2 TECUMSEH this volume, sprang from the Shawnees, an energetic and warlike tribe of Algonquian stock. The Algonquins, whose tribal branches were scattered from Labrador to the Rockies and from Hudson Bay to North Carolina, believed that a deity presided over each of the four cardinal points of the compass. Shawan was the guardian spirit of the South ; and, as the tribe to which Tecumseh belonged formerly lived south of the other tribes, its members became known as Shawanoes, or Shawnees-that is, Southerners. Little is known of the history of the Shaw- nees, for they were restless bands, greater wanderers even than the generality of Indians, and their continuai change of settlement baffles historical research. Upon the southern shores of Lake Erie, on the banks of the Ohio, and along the broad Mississippi, at different times they pitched their tents. The name of the river Suwanee, or « Swanee,' corrupted from their own, marks their abode at one time in Georgia and Florida. The Shawnees were originally divided into twelve clans, each clan adopting as its totem a reptile, bird, or animal that at some time had been regarded as a benign spirit. As a result of continuai wars and wandering, how-",
         "THE BOYHOOD 0F TECUMSEH 3 ever, the twelve clans had dwindled to f our. Only the Mequachake, Chillicothe, Piqua, and Xiscopoke remained. In the first of these, Which conducted ail tribal rites, the chief- Ship was hereditary ; in the other three it was the reward of merit. To the Kiscopoke clan belonged Tecumseh's father, Puckeshinwau ('something that drops'1). lie had been elevated to the rank of chief by his brother-warriors, and at the time of Tecumseh's birth was a powerful leader among hl's people. The panther was the totem of his clan. Tecumseh's mother, named Methoa- taske (' a turtle laying eggs in the sand '), is 8aici to have been noted for wisdorn among the women of her tribe, and ber name shows that she belonged to the clan having the turtle as its totem. After much wandering, Pucke- 8hinwau settled down in the Ohio country Wvith bis family and the band that accom- Pariied him in bis migrations. It was in the Old Indian village of Piqua, about six miles 8OUth..west of the site of the present city of Springfield, Obio, and within sound of the rushing waters of tbe Mad River, that he set Up the wigwam in which, in the year 1768, Tecumseh first opened bis eyes. We are told that a rich, wide plateau, gemmed with wild",
         "4 TECUMSEH flowers, extended between the village and the river, and that precipitous cliffs rose on one side, while rolling his crowned with tai trees completed the circle of the village. Tecumseh was the fourth child of a family of seven. His eiders were Cheeseekau, the eldest son, Tecumapease, the only daughter, and Sauwaseekau; the younger children were Nehasumo, Laulewasikaw, and Kumshakaw. The two last were twins; and twins were held in superstitious awe by the Indians, who feared them as possessed of occuit power, and frequently put one or both to death. In this instance no such fate befeli the children. Kumshakaw evinced none of the dreaded attributes, and lived to a ripe old age, but Laulewasikaw, by his practice of magic and claims of supernatural knowledge and power, as we shall see later, bore out the ancient belief. Tecumseh in his early days was Ieft largely to, the care of his sister, Tecumapease. Thus between the two there arose a strong attach- ment which lasted until Tecumseh's death. From the well-known Indian practices in rela- tion to the bringing up of young children we can imagine how the days of his infancy were passed. When not rolling on the ground, the child would be closely confined in his curious",
         "THE BOYHOOD 0F TECUMSEH 5 cradie, a sack made from the skin of an animal and bound to a thin, straight board, soniewhat larger than his body. Great care would be taken to keep straight the infant limbs, that their symmetry might be preserved in later life. This was the first stage in the making of an Indian stoic. Every part of the cradie Weas symbolical. That the child's life might be preserved, the heart of a tree was used for the cradie board. Along the wooden bow above the child's head, which symbolized the Sky, zigzag furrows were cut to represent lightnjng, the power of which was designated bY Suspended arrows. Through holes in the 11Pper part of the board was threaded a leather thong, or burden-strap, which Tecuma- pease passed about her forehead when carry- 11g the papoose on her back, or which the ITiother fastened to the pommel of her saddle Wehen making long journeys. It served also tO hang the cradie to the branch of a tree, W1hen the child swayed backwards and for- Weards with the motion of the bough while the wind crooned him to sleep. The cradie WeoUId sometimes be placed upright against a tree-trunk, so that Tecumseh's eyes might folîow Tecumapease as she helped to grind the corn in a hollow stone or sif t it through",
         "ô TECUMSEH baskets; or, again, while she mixed the meal into cakes, and carefully covered tbem with leaves before baking them in the ashes. Sometimes Tecumapease would carry Te- cumseh on ber back to where Methoataske worked in the field witb the other women of her tribe. Like them, from bearing heavy burdens and doing the drudgery of the camp, Tecumapease was strong and sturdy rather than graceful. Her hair, black and glossy as a raven's wing, hung below her waist in a beavy braid. The short, loose sleeves of her fringed leather smock gave freedom to ber strong brown arms. A belted skirt, leggings, and embroidered moccasins completed her cos- tume. On special occasions, like other Indian women, she adorned herseif with a beit and collar of coloured wampum, weaving strarids of it into her hair; and sometimes a necklace of polished elk-teetb gleamed on ber dusky throat. Wben Tecumseh had learned the use of bis legs, be would romp about the camp witb the other black-eyed cbildren of bis tribe. He watcbed bis father, Puckeshinwau, make the flint arrow- head and split tbe wooden shaft to receive it, bind it firmly witb a tbong, and tip the other end of the sbaft witb a feather to wing it on its fligbt; and saw the men build the birch",
         "THE BOYHOOD 0F TECUMSEH 7 canme, so light that one man could shoulder it, yet strong enough to carry a heavy load. During Tecumseh's childhood the Indians rlorth of the Ohio were in a state of unrest. They had been subdued by Bouquet,' but the leniency of that humane leader, in merely exacting that they should return their white Prisoners and remain at peace, was looked on by the tribes as a mark of weakness ; and, While no open war broke out, young warriors OCcasionally attacked traders anid settiers. By the Treaty of Fort Stanwix, in 1768, the Six Nlations had ceded to the wl-ites the land between the Ohio and the Tennessee. But this was the common hunting-ground of al the tribes, and the Indians both south and 11orth of the Ohio resented the action of the Six Nations and opposed the entrance of white 8ettlers into this region. They were encour- aged in their opposition by the action of the British government in procîaiming the terri- tory West of the Alleghanies Indian country and forbidding settlers to enter it. But the hardy Virginians could not be kept out, and P'IOWIY but surely ever westward the smoke of their woodland huts ascended, and the forests 'See The War Chief of the Ottawas in this Series.",
         "8 TECUMSEH of what are now Kentucky and Tennessee were f alling beneath the axe of the frontiers- men. Resentful of the encroachments of the Virginians on their hunting-grounds, frequent war-parties of Shawnees, Delawares, Mohicans, Cherokees, and Mingoes crossed the Ohio and crept stealthily on some unguarded settie- ment, to slay and scalp the inhabitants and carry off their horses and cattie. The chiefs disclaimed responsibility for these raids, but in words which made the settiers in a sense responsible for them. [t was we [they said] who so kindly re- ceived Europeans on their first arrivai into our own country. We took them by the hand and bade them welcome, to sit down by our side and live with us as brothers; but how did they requite our kindness ? They at first asked only for a little land on which to raise bread for their families and pasture their cattie, which we freely gave thern. They saw the game in the woods which the Great Spirit had given us for our subsistence, and they wanted it too. They penetrated into the woods in quest of game, they discovered spots of land which they also wanted, and because",
         "THE BOYHOOD 0F TECUMSEH 9 we were loath to part with it, as we saw they already had more than they had need of, they took it from us by force and drove us to a great distance from our homes. At this time there was not community of 'flterest or united action among the colonies. leennsylvania and Virginia each claimed au- thority in the Indian country. The Penn- IJYlvanians viewed the country from a trading Point of view ; the Virginians viewed it as a field for settiement. So bitter was the feud between the two colonies that for a time civil 8trife was imminent. And while this family Suarrel was at its height, the Indian scalping raiids grew in frequency and violence; and the mnemory of the Pontiac War was stili fresh inl the rninds of the frontiersmen. Many Penn- 8Ylvanians in the west became alarmed, and \u0026OOri the passes of the Alleghanies were filled With fugitive settiers returning to their former hOITies. The Virginians of Kentucky were Mrade of sterner stuif. Lord Dunmore, the royal governor of Virginia, was ambitious for 'lis colony, and determined to make good by the SWord Virginia's claim to the region of which Fort Pitt was the centre ; and, under leaders lilce the veteran borderers, Michael Cresap and",
         "Io TECUMSEH Daniel Boone, and the youthful and audacious hunter and surveyor, George Rogers Clark, the Virginians strengthened their fortified villages and led successful raids against the tribes north of the Ohio. For some time the Shawnees had been at peace, but in the latter part of April 1774, when two Indians suspected of horse-stealing were put to death near Wheeling, on the Ohio, they threatened war. A little later a party of Vir- ginians fired upon a band of Indiaris, and killed several. Again, thirty-two white nmen, hitherto friends of the Indians, set out to attack a hunting-party of warriors camped on the Ohio. A friendly squaw warned them to return, as the Indians, who were carousing, had vowed vengeance for the death of their tribesmen. But the white men had deter- mined to destroy the band ; and by the pro- mise of more runi they enticed a number of the Indians to cross the river to, their camp, where they put all to death, with the excep- tion of one child, not even sparing the kindly counsellor. Other Indians across the river, alarmed by the sound of shooting, sent two canoes to the rescue, but the whites drawn up on shore fired upon their occupants, kili- ing twelve and wounding several more. The",
         "THE BOYHOOD 0F TECUMSEH- ii Iridians were further incensed by the murder Of Bald Eagle, a sachem of the Delawares, who Was attacked and scalped while returning from a visit ta a fort at the mouth of the Great 1(anawha, and whose body, placed in an up- right position in his canoe, was found drifting dOwn the Ohio by his enraged followers. Even Silver Heels, a favourite Shawnee chief, barely escaped death. While guiding sonie white Settiers along unfamiliar trails on their way tO safety, he was severely wounded by the bullets of other whites waiting for him in 'Unbush. Such deeds as these urged on the inevitable War, for which the Indians now openly pre- Pared. Even the mighty Mingo chief, Logan, '9hO had ever extended the harxd of friendship tO the white man, now appeared with uplifted tonmahawk ta avenge the unprovoked murder of his friends. Some eight hundred warriors Weere soon assembled, thirsting ta avenge these recent murders, and eager ta establish their r1ght to the disputed territory. Logan, Elen- tpSco, Red Eagle, and Puckeshinwau were ~lead the Indians, with Cornstalk, ' the 4lighty sachem of the Shawnee, and king of the IlOrthern. confederacy,' in supreme command. SO it happened that in 1774, when the",
         "12 TECUMSEH eastern colonies were on the verge of revolu- tion, the west was in the throes of an Indian war. When Lord Dunmore learned that the Shawnees had declared war, he at once pro- ceeded to raise in Virginia an army ofi fteen hundred men; and he instructed General Andrew Lewis to go to Kentucky and recruit among the borderers there an army of the same numerical strength, and march to the mouth of the Great Kanawha, where the two armies would meet. Meanwhile Dunmore advanced to Fort Pitt; but here he changed his plan, marched to the Scioto, and en- trenched his force not far from the Indian town of Old Chillicothe.1 The 9th of October found Lewis with his troops encamped at Point Pleasant, where the Great Kanawha pours its waters into the Oh 'io, when a messenger arrived with new orders directing him to cross the Ohio and join Dun- more on the Scioto for an advance against the Indian towns to the north. Next morn- ing the camp was astir at daybreak, and the soldiers were busily preparing for their in- tended march, when a scout returned with news that, about a mile away, a large body of Inclians lay in ambush. 1On Paint Creefr, near the present city cf Chillicothe, Ohio.",
         "THE BOYHOOD 0F TECUMSEH 13 These were Cornstalk's warriors, who had arrived at the Great Kanawha the night before. Advised by active scouts of every movement Of the enemy, Cornstalk's Shawnees, Dela- wares, Mingoes, and Ioways had crossed the Ohio on the 9th and had lain ail night amn- bushed in the wet woods, impatiently awaiting the dawn. Shortly after sunrise they per- Ceived the Americans advancing to the attack 'Il two detachments, one at some distance from the Ohio, the other along its bank. Presently Corrlstalk gave the signal to attack both bodies Sivaultaneously, and the piercing war-cry re- 80Unded through the forest as the Indians tuslied upon the advancing foe. In the first furjous onset the Americans were beaten back, Severa1 of them being killed and an officer fatalîy wounded. Cornstalk's commanding Yier ose high above the clash of arms, cheer- lton his followers ; but the Americans, reinforced fromn their camp, and fighting des- Perateîy, finally drove the Indians fromn the field. Tecumseh's father, Puckeshinwau, and ?thers amnong the ablest warriors, had fallen In the early onrush. Cornstaîk led his defeated warriors to the Valley of the Scioto. Here a council-fire was klindIed and the chiefs gathered about- it.",
         "14 TECUMSEH Irito the middle of the circle stepped Corn- stalk with gloomy countenance but majestic, bearing. Searching the faces of those he had led through the long day of battie, he gave voice to the question that was in the mind of al-' What is now our course ?' The only response was the crackling of the fire as its fitful light played on the dusky warriors. 'The Long Knives are coming upon us by two routes,' he continued. ' Shail we fight thern -Yes or No?' The only answer was the harsh, ominous cry of a night-bird. « Shall we kill all our women and children and then fight until we ourselves are killed ?' The chiefs still maintained a gloorny silence. Cornstalk wheeled suddenly about; his toma- hawk gleamed in the firelight and then sanlc quivering into the war-post which stood -ini the midst. ' Since you are not inclined to fight, I will go and make peace!1' he ex- claimed. Runners bearing beits of white wampuni were at once dispatched by the Indians to inform, Lord Dunmore, who was now en- camped not.far from the Shawnee settiement, of their desire for peace. A conference was arranged, only eighteen chitfs, with unarmed escorts, being permitted to attend. Logan,",
         "THE BOYHIOOD 0F TECUMSEH- x.5 although not averse to peace, had refused to be present. But as the consent of such au Iifluential chief was necessary to any Indian treaty, Dunmore sent a special messenger to hfly1 in the person of Colonel Gibson. Gibson mlet Logan in the forest, and there Logan gave vent to his pent-up feelings with passion- Qte eloquence. I appeal to any white man to say if he ever entered Logan's cabin l-ungry and lie gave him not meat ; if ever lie came cold and naked and he clothed him not. tDuring the course of the last long and bioody war, Logan remained idie in his cabin, an advocate of peace. Sucli was M1Y love for the whites that my country- Mnen pointed as they passed and said, 'Logan is the friend of white men.' Colonel Cresap,' the last spring and in cold blood and unprovoked, murdered ail the relations of Logan, not even sparing my Womnen and chuldren. There runs not a clrop of my blood in the veins of any living Creature. This called on me for revenge. 1 have sought it. I have killed many. I ~Lgan was mistaken: Cresap was not the murderer. See Sfreet's Winning of the West, part ii, P. 31.",
         "16 TECUMSEH have fully glutted my vengeance. For my, country, I rejoice at the beams of peace. But do not harbour a thought that mine is the j oy of fear. Logan neyer feit fear. He will not turn on his heel to save hi$ life. Who is there to mourn for Logan ? Not one. Gibson recorded the words of Logan, and they were duly presented to Dunmore. A treaty of peace was drawn up, by which the Indians agreed to give up ail white prisoners and stolen horses and to surrender àll dlaim to the land south of the Ohio. The effect of Lord Dunmore's war was tO make peace in the hinterland, a matter of vast importance to the Americans on the eve of the, Revolution. Great Britain by the Quebec Act had placed the country north of the Ohio and extending to the Mississippi under the government of Canada. But Great Britai was soon too busy with the war in the east tO pay any attention to the west, and the hinterl land posts remained as they were, feeblY guarded and, except for Detroit, adminis' tered by French creoles. The Indians, it i0 true, were friendly to the British, but the crushing defeat they had received at the handO",
         "Sca/e of Ml/es O -20 40 60 80 /00 Batoo e ,Ediný",
         "THE BOYHOOD OF TECUJMSEH 17 Of Lewis and the humiliating terms they were forced to make with Dunniore left them, im- Potent. They once more began their raids, but they Were incapable of concerted action;- and When in 1778 George Rogers Clark, with a feeble force of less than two hundred nmen, advanced against the British posts at Kaskaskia and Cahokia on the Mississippi and Vincennes on the Wabash, they were unable to hinder his r1narch. These posts fell into the hands of the AMTericans, and the Indians, as we shaîl see, Were doomed. After the battle of Point Pleasant, Cheesee- kau, Tecumseh's eldest brother, led his father's Warrjors back to the village of Piqua, where the disasters of the fight were recounted. Stili eOvered with the stains of battie, Cheeseekau lrelated to his mother and his awestruck brothers and sisters the manner of his brave !father's death. The dark shadow of mourn- 111g fell upon the survivors. Throughout the Weellage rose the wail of the death-song, Methoa- tsesvoice niingling in the dirge of the f,'dOýWs; and so a new and tragic scene was 'tnprinted upon the young Tecumseh's plastic A father's task now feli upon Cheeseekau, T.",
         "18 TECUMSEH who took much pride in instructing his younger brother in the art of war and in hunt- irxg, and how to endure fatigue and to per- f orm feats of agility arnd daring. He gave hini tessons in woodcraft anid f orest lore, showing hini how to snare the fish, to stallc the wary deer, to guide the frail canoe through treacherous rapids, and, with tightly fastened snow -shoe, to traverse the wintry waste. Tecumseh, of course, had learned to swim almost as soon as he could walk; in running it is said that he could easily out-distance his companions; while his skill with the bow excited their admiration and envy. His greatest delight, however, was to niuster his playmates into rival bands for mimic warfare. The history of Tecumseh's nation was not recorded in cold print between the covers of a book; it Iived in the memories of the eIders and on the lips of orators and sachemis. Ini impassioned language and with graphic gesture the deeds of the past were conjured up before the minds of the listeners. By the light of the camp-fire the stripling heard, with kind- ling eye and throbbing pulse, the tales of the heroic dead; and he early formed the ambition to become a leader of his race. Sanie sachemi would sadly sketch the smiàling",
         "THE BOYHOOD 0F TECUMSEH i9 Scenes of health and happiness in the days before the pale-face came to wrest from the tfldians their land, the gift of the Great Spirit. And as the boy listened to these Stories of encroachment and oppression, a fierce impulse firedhis blood and bade him check the advance of the whites and win back the land of which his people had been robbed. Thus was moulded his life's high Purpose; thus was fanned that spark of eloquence which later burst into flame and fired the hearts of his race, from Florida to the Great Lakes.",
         "CHAPTER II THE BAPTISM 0F FIRE THE populOUS Indian village of Piqua on the Mad River had prospered during six years of peace. The fertile plains about it had been cultivated in the rude fashion of the Indian, and the corn now stood ripening in the August sun with promise of an abundant harvest. Amid such a scene Tecumseh and his young companions, tired of their play, threw themn- selves down one evening to listen to the excit- ing tales of the warriors who lounged smoking in the cool shade. The women busied theni- selves about the camp-fires cooking the gamne just brought in by the men. The voices of the Indian girls rose and feil in monotonous song as with nimble fingers they deftly wove the rushes into mats, while keeping a watchful eye upon the littie ones who played near by. The few years of peace had given the inhabitantS of Piqua a feeling of security, and they did not know that the dark cloud of war even thexi overshadowed themn.",
         "THE BAPTISM 0F FIRE 21 The agents of the British commandant at Detroit had been busy among the Indians 8eeking to enlist their aid against the revolu- tiOrlists. And in May of this year (1780) a Party of six hundred warriors from the country tiorth of the Ohio, accompanied by a few Canadians, had raided a number of villages in kertucky, siain many settiers, and carried off horses and prisoners. George Rogers Clark,' rl'OW holding the rank of colonel in the Ameri- etan army, was on a visit to Kentucky. The frontiersmen rallied about him; and with a body of 970 crack riflemen he crossed the Ohio Ild advanced on the town of Old Chillicothe. l'eIndians there had been warned and the toVwVj was deserted. The Americans burnt it t0 the ground and continued their march to Piqua. At this time there were in Piqua about two hufldred warriors and two British agents, Siri0in Girty and his brother, who had fought 'Itnder Dunmore against the Shawnees in 1774, eLI Who were now known to the Kentuckians \"a 'the white renegades.' The appearance of 'Clark and his raiders on the outskirts of the Village took the inhabitants completely by 811tPrise. At the first note of alarm, the 'WOrnen, wild with terror, snatched up their",
         "22 TECUMSEH infants and fled shrieking to the woods. Tecumseh and the older children followed, hastily gathering a f ew treasured possessions. The warriors, awakening the forest echoes with their defiant war-cries, took up their posi- tion in an old fort which commanded the river. From the opposite side the Kentucky rifle- men assailed the fort, which, in its decayed and ruinous condition, off ered but poor shelter. The Indians quickly evacuated it, but not before several had been killed. While the defenders were occupied by the attack froni across the river, a detachment of the enemny crept round through the wood and suddenly emerged at the rear of the village. The red men rushed to the defence of their wigwams, and kept the enemy at bay for some time ; but the whites being vastly superior in number, the Indians were defeated with great loss, and the whites applied the torch to the village. At length, when the cry of battie and thie sound of firing had ceased, the women anid children ventured to creep forth from theif f orest shelter. The enemy had gone, but had lef t a scene of desolation behind. The village was a heap of smoking ruins, and the cornil the fields was laid waste. Bodies of dead warriors strewed the ground, many of thefi'",
         "THE BAPTISM 0F FIRE 23 lYing stretched before their own wigwams, Whjch they had defended so bravely. A scene Of smiling peace had indeed been turned into onie of deepest mourning. Content and happi- Iless had fled before the ruthless destroyer, and he had gone forward to the next Indian Village on bis mission of destruction. The impression made by this scene upon Trecumseh's youthful mind was enduring. The Youth gazed with awe at the dead warriors anid watched with childish wonder the pre- Parations for burial. The fallen defenders Of Piqua might not have the customary funeral dress, for such things had been de- 8troyed by the fire, but the survivors did what tileir resources permitted. About the mat Whereon each warrior lay were placed bis tOniahawk, scalping-knife, and other weapons Of war. By his side lay his bow and arrow, Wherewith to resumne the chase with phantom hlurters in the Indian paradise. As darkness dlescended upon the village the women stole Out to mourn by the new-made graves. Dur- in1g four nights they faithfully kept long Vigil until the lurid light of the funeral fires Paled against the brightening dawn. Then, ,Ifter these last solemn tribal rites had been Performed, the Shawnees gathered together",
         "24 TECUMSEH their few remaining possessions and followed the trail, leading about thirty miles in a north- westerly direction, to the Great Miami, where they rebuilt their houses.1 A modern Ameri- can city, with its great milis and costly resi- dences, preserves the Shawnee name of Piqua, and marks the site where these poor Indiau fugitives set up their wigwams in the autumft Of 1780. The feud between the Indians and the whites continued with unabated fury. Cheeseekau was now as noted a warrior as his father had been, and became the leading spirit in many fierce frontier encounters. At the camp-fire Tecumseh listened eagerly as his brother told his thrilling tales. So persistent was Tecumseh's plea to be allowed to go on the war-path that Cheeseekau promised to let hini taste real fighting in an attack on a party of whites encamped a few miles south of Piqua. The youth, impatient for the fray, set out bravely with Cheeseekau and his warriors, but when the actual horrors of war, with its blood and confusion, burst upon him, he fled frorn the field. It may be recalled that Fredericlc the Great, when first under fine, did the same. The time soon came when, acconding to 1See Handbook of Amarican Indiana, vol. ii, p. 26o.",
         "THE BAPTISM 0F FIRE 25 1nidian custom, Tecumseh must undergo the soIemn ordeal of initiation. He must establish hi8 personal relationship with the unseen world before taking rank as a warrior in his tribe. eor this purpose he must go into the solitary Woods or ascend some lonely mountain, where, by virtue of fasting, lie should receive super- Ilatural help and a revelation of the unknown. lie entered alone into the green gloom of the ÎOrest. Wild things at which lie had been WOflt to draw his bow now peered at him from the bushes and crossed his path unharmed. '?rmany days he saw the rising Sun shine ýhrOugh the dewy woods and watched it sink 111 Spiendour below the tree-tops. He slept the tired sleep of youth, and woke refreshed tresume his sacred quest. One day, weary Weith continuai wandering and exhausted from eersistent fasting, he threw himself down Whelere a littie stream poured its waters into 0' rocky basin. Lulled by the music of the Waterfall, lie f el asleep. Then in a dream was revealed to him the unseen world. Suddenly, GOIt of a cluster of stars shot one, b ighter than the rest, with shining train. Its brilliance 8tertled him from sleep. About him were the farnliar trees, and placid moonlight silvered the Waterfall. Across his passive mind flitted",
         "26 TECUMSEH half-remembered tales of strange monsters of the sky. The flaming meteor now assumed the crouching shape of a panther about to spring on its prey ; now that of a dragon taking its flight across some midnight sky to seek the dark waters of a lake, where it was condemned to dwell, lest it should set the world on fire. Wooed by the slumberous music of the faîl, sleep once more closed the dreamer's heavy eyes. Scarcely had he crossed the threshold of this unknown world when the briglit symbol again traced its path. So often did the strange messenger appear that lie accepted it as the radiant guardian of hir, destiny. When lie returned to his people they were filled with rejoicing that his dream haci been of things above, for this augured well. Henceforth they called him ' the shooting star,' or, in their own soft tongue, ' Tecumtha.' When the elaborate religious ceremonies customary to the initiation of a warrior had been performed, Tecumnseh's power of physi- cal endurance was put to a severe test. H3e presented himself for public torture before the chiefs and warriors of his tribe. Sharp skewers were thrust through the muscles of lis back, and from these he was suspended bY thongs to a pole. Had le flincled or evinced",
         "THE BAPTISM 0F FIRE -27 any sign of anguish during this painful ordeal, lie would have been rejected as unworthy to take his place among his tribesnien. With Stoic fortitude, however, lie endured the tor- ture, and when it was ended took a warrior 's rarik among his people. Tecumseh was not content with the narrow territory which satisfied his tribesmen. He desired to explore regions far remote from the h1Unting..grounds of the Shawnees. The same Wanderjng instinct that had led his father to the Ohio country awakened within him. His fancy roamned beyond the familiar trails and peopled foreign regions with strange tribes. By his eloquence he played upon the responsive Mfinds of his companions until they were fired W9'ith the same restless spirit. A waridering if e became the theme of general interest as they 8mloked round the evening camp-fire. When fhIally fifty of the boldest expressed a desire tgo on such an expedition as Tecumseh had Planned, a party was organized. With due cerernony Cheeseekau was appointed leader, tO decide each day's journey and choose the eaiTlping-.ground; and he bore with him a tribal talisman to ensure safety and success \"'Id to be consulted when they were uncertain '18 te their course.",
         "28 TECUMSEH Along the well-worn trail Cheeseekau started forth, followed in Indian file by his young adventurers, none more eager than Tecumseh. The narrow path, worn smooth by the feet of runners, followed high ground to avoid the dense brush, and led to points where the streams were shallowest and most easily ford- able. Every day soon after sunrise the party was journeying through new regions which unfolded beauties ever fresh. At sunset they pitched their tents, lighted their fires, and gathered about them to discuss the day's adventures. Thus they journeyed until they came to the waters of the Mississinewa, ini what is now northern Indiana. By its banlc Cheeseekau chose a favourable spot whereon to pitch the tents. Here they remained until' their interest in the surrounding country was exhausted. Then they took a westward trail. Signs of Indian occupation were everywhere visible. Where the path abruptly mounted a steep ascent, a mound of pebbles would be heaped in the ravine. Each passer-by had cast his tribute on the pile as an offering to, good spirits that they might lessen his fatigue in the toilsome climb. At last they reached the broad Mississippi. By its waters the adventurous band remained until the sun had",
         "THE BAPTISM 0F FIRE 29 Mlade a complete course. Theri they took a SOUtherly route through the Illinois country, Where the trail had been miade by the count- less hoofs of the bison, through whose haunts it led. Presently the prairies stretched be- fore theni, and they saw the skin-covered teepees 1 of the dwellers of the plains. They jOiried a party of Mandans and soon were free to follow with theni the exciting chase of the buffalo. A hunting-party was organized etda leader was chosen with due ceremony eccording to tribal rites. Those engaging in this dangerous pastime were mounted. They 8Pread out so as to form, a circle round the dense herd of buffaloes. By this means an eqa chance was ensured to each hunter. TýUrn what way they would, the confused and 8truggling animais were confronted by hunters Viith gun and bow. When the sport was at it height misfortune befeil Tecumseh. When afl infuriated bull escaped fromn the ring, Tlecumseh rode after hirn in hot pursuit. hUt his horse suddenly stumbled and threw Sheavily to the ground. Those nearest aloped to rescue him from the trampling h00fs of the following herd, but they found \"Munable to rise, for his thigh had been btroken by the faîl. He was borne back to",
         "30 TECUMSEH camp, and there was carefully tended. Every- thing known to the Indian doctor's art was done to heal him, but owing to his mishap the band were forced to prolong their stay at the hunting-place. When at last Tecumseh was fit for the trail the party moved southward. After a time they saw the smoke of distant camp-fires. Thereupon Cheeseekau halted his nmen and dispatched two niessengers with a packet of tobacco and a beit of wampum to signify his friendly intent. The rest donned their gala garments and painted their faces in readiness to receive visitors. With the messengers came two Cherokees to conduct the Shawnees to their settiement, where the chief warriors of the tribe welcomed Cheesee- kau and his braves. After the calumet had gone the rounds in token of goodwill, the Cherokee chief explained that their hatchet was raised against the white settlers, and that they were on the eve of setting out on the war-path. This was good news for the Shawnees, who promptly agreed to cast in their lot with the Cherokees. While Tecumseh and his companions were making ready for war, Cheeseekau withdreW ta fast and thus ta prepare hi.mself to consuit worthily the sacred talisman of the tribe.",
         "THE BAPTISM 0F FIRE P1 The future was revealed to hilm in a trance. lesaw the Cherokees and bis own band, brightly painted for war, move forward to battle under the leadership of a gbostly 8eri-blance of himself. Suddenly a musket rang out and a bullet sped from the enemy's lille. His wraitb was struck full in the fore- head and fell to earth ini the agony of death. Or' rejoining bis comrades he related bis vision 'L'd foretold that in the battie about to take place he should meet death. He said aiso, however, that, if the Iridians fought on, 'ctory would crown their efforts. Cheeseekau remained undaunted by bis evil ýIision, and when tbe day of battie arrived led hiS warriors forth as usual. Incited by tbe Shawnees, tbe Cherokees fought stubbornly, etIid success seemed about to be achieved. ~1t at the hour foretold, in the thickest of the figbt, tbe fatal bullet found its mark, \"'Id Cbeeseekau fell pierced througb the fore- head. The second part of the propbecy was unh1leeded. Deaf to, Tecumseh's loud avenging CrY, and heedless of his rallying shout, the %'perstitious Indians fled in a panic. 1Tecumseh feit keenly the deatb of his noble brother, who had guided his youthful mind in ÎLiI tllings, and deeply bis followers mourned",
         "32 TECUMSEH the loss of their dauntless leader, who had directed them safely through ail their wander- ings. Tecumseh was now chosen leader un- animously. For nearly two years he and his comrades remained in the south, taking an active part in many forays. Exciting incidents were not lacking. For a time Tecumseh's band dwelt near a cane thicket on the Tennessee, whither they had gone in quest of booty. Here they were fre- quently attacked. On one occasion, under cover of darkness, thirty whites stealthily sur- rounded the Shawnees, thinking to take theni by surprise. Tecumseh was occupied in flay- ing the last of the day's quarry, when his quick ear caught the sound of their approach. With a shrill war-cry he sumrnoned his sleep- ing band. Without pausing to consider the numbers of the f oe, he charged them fearlessl3y and his men followed himn impetuously. The enemy were routed by the furious attacc, and the Indians bore two scalps back to theif camp in triumph. By such exploits Tecumseh won great renown among the southern triber, as a warrior. Unlike his followers, he cared little for plunder : his ruling passion was the love of glory. In the end the adventurers turned their face$",
         "THE BAPTISM 0F FIRE 33 ho0meward. They travelled through West Virginia, crossed the Ohio near the mouth of the Scioto, and visited the Indian villages SCattered along that river. And as the ver- dure of summer was changing into the tints of eutumn in the year 1 790, they passed familiar 8cerles along the Great Miami. Tecum-seh, '4ho had gone out as a follower of his brother býUt was now leader, brought eight survivors back to Piqua, where he was received with elanorous rej oicing. Such apparently aimless wanderings were 81lOWIY but surely shaping Tecumseh's life for fUture action. By his intercourse with the \"larious tribes, by learning their languages a1IcI customs, he had gleaned knowledge which W'as later to be of the greatest use to him; and hi$ widespread reputation as a warrior was to eOUnt with telling effect ini that great plan etid purpose of his life-the formation of his Ihidian confederacy",
         "CHAPTER III A LEADER AMONG HIS PEOPLE APTER the feast of welcome at Piqua the villagers gathered round the camp-fire and plied the adventurers with rnany questions. The wanderers recounted the exciting ex- ploits of their band and told of Cheeseekau's summons to the spirit-world and of his brave death on the distant battlefield. Then they in turn listened eagerly as an old chief rose and dramatically related the important events that had taken place in their absence. Hie told how General Harmar, with three hundred troops of the Thirteen Fires and eleven hundred Kentucky volunteers, had advancedl into the Miami country and laid waste ail their cornfields ; how he and bis followerS had watched from a distant bill the soldierrS at their work of destruction ; and hoW Colonel Hardin, spying them in the distance, had suddenly turned and attacked therri. With rapid gestures the chief described the U4",
         "A LEADER AMONG HIS PEOPLE 35 Pretended flight of the Indians. He told how, When out of sight of the enemy, they had 'divided their force and marched back some 'distance on either side of their trail. Assum- irlg a crouching attitude and cunning mien, lie pictured themn as they crept back through the tall grass towards the place where they Wý%aited for the enemy. Then he recalled their lOUd, triumphant yells as they rushed upon the foe. He snatched his tomahawk from h~is beit to go through the movements of the Iridians striking and cutting down the white n'non ail sides, and told how the white leader escaped with but a handful of his men. IÎe depicted further victories of the Indians. Colonel Hardin had returned with five hundred 'nilitia and sixty regulars to take vengeance on his savage foes. The regulars remained at the Veillage, while the militia, bent on revenge, rOuted the few Indians whomn they found lurking about. But the Indians were not really beaten. Blue Jacket of the Shawnees 'Ind Little Turtle of the Miamis concealed their %Sernbled warriors in another ambush. At the critical moment the Indians rushed fromn their ambuscade, fell upon both regulars and 'lilitia, and pitilessly drove them ever farther back.",
         "36 TECUMSEH Tecumseh had not long to wait for the time when he should again embark on active ser- vice. In the autumn of 1791 news came that Generals St Clair and Butler were advancing from the south with an army of some f ourteen hundred men. Tecumseh was placed in corn- mand of a party of scouts to watch the move- ments of the enemy. On November 3 he dis- covered the American army encamped at the upper waters of theWabash about twentymiles north of Greenville. At once he dispatched runners to tell the war chiefs Blue Jacket and Little Turtie of the enemy's position. On the following morning the Americans awolce to find their camp surrounded by whoop- ing savages. A frightful slaughter ensued. General Butler arnd many of the officers were siain, together with nearly haif the troops. The remainder fled in disorder. General St Clair himself escaped on a pack-horse aftet having had three horses killed under him i the battie. The next winter, when the snow lay deep i, the forest, Tecumseh, while on a hunting ex- pedition with ten warriors and a boy, made his camp near Big Rock, not far fromn Piqua. One morning after breakfast, as they sat about",
         "A LEADER AMONG HIS PEOPLE 37 the fire smoking and discussing plans for the daY, they were suddenly assailed by a storm of bullets. A Party of whites, three times their number, under Robert M'Clelland, had attacked them. Instantly the Indian war-cry rang out on the clear, frosty air. Tecumiseh CalIed to the boy to run to shelter, and he and his compariions returned the fire of their B.ssailants. Black Turkey, one of the Indians, took to his heels and was running away at fuill 8Peed, but in obedience to Tecumseh's angry CeO1rxnand he halted and returned to join in the battie. On came the whites with challeng- 111g shout, answered by defiant war-whoops. The assaulting party was finally beaten back ; Orid Tecumseh, with his men, pursued them through the woods, driving them fromn every Shleltering tree and cover. Shortly after this, Tecumseh, with a party of chiefs and warriors, established his head- quarters on a southern tributa y of the Little Miarni. From this point they made frequent ~Iiroads upon the property of white settiers, Plunidering flat-boats on the Ohio, and captur- \"t'g sorne of the finest horses belonging to icentuckians. It was here that Tecumseh had nlore than one encounter with Simon Kenton, thle Well-known Anierican Pioneer. Hearing",
         "38 TECUMSEH of the exploits of the marauders, Kenton quickly mustered thirty-six men and set out to punish them. He came upon the Indians at night, divided his force into three detach- ments, and surrounded the encampment. That night Tecumseh had flung himself down by the camp-fire. The flickering light threw into fitful relief the bark tents of his sleeping companions. It did not penetrate, however, the gloom where lurked the watchful Americans. One of the Indians rose to stir the smouldering embers. A rifle cracked sharply, and the warrior feil f orward into the fire. At the saine moment a body of the Americans made a rush for the camp. Tecumseh leaped up and called loudly to hi$ companions. He felled his first assailant witb his war-club and dealt savage blows to al within reach. A shower of bullets rained upon the tents, but the Indians were now aroused and ready to return the fire. Presently re- inf orcements came from the Indians of a near- by camp who had heard the yelling and shooting; and the whites were dispersed. Tecumseh's next skirmish with Kenton was in 1793. He was hunting in the Scioto valleY with a few followers and their families. Shortly before dawn, when it was supposed",
         "A LEADER AMONG HIS PEOPLE 39 that the Indians would not be on their guard, RCenton's men surrounded the camp and Cautiously closed in upon it. The loud bark- 111g of a dog gave the alarm. to the Indians. Mien the whites charged, the Indians sought 8helter behind trees. Though Tecunmseh was surrounded by a superior force, lie maintained his presence of mind. He ordered some of bis 'Tien to bring up the horses while he and Others defended the camp. In the end the Iradians adroitly managed to escape with their *Grnen and children. In the engagement they had sustained a loss of but one warrior. Two years passed in this desultory fighting, \u0026ter the defeat of St Clair's army, before the AmTericans made any organized attempt to r'etrieve their fortunes. But ini the autumn of 1793 General Anthony Wayne marched into the Indian country with a strong and thor- 01ighly disciplined army. He encamped for tewinter at Greenville and buit several fOirts: one, which he erected at the place of St Clajr's 'disaster, he hopefully named Fort keCovery. In the summer of 1794 the Indians W%'atched three hundred pack-horses laden with f8Our making their way towards this fort, 1tider the protection of an escort of ninety",
         "40 TECUMSEH riflemen and fifty dragoons. The savages hovered about, but they f ound the force too strong to attack. Their chance came later. By the time the escort was ready ta re- turn, one thousand tribesmen had assembled. The Americans had proceeded only about four hundred yards from the fort when they found themselves surrounded. The dragoorie charged the Indians, but were repulsed with heavy loss. Then they manoeuvred to regain the fort, but the Indian forces cut themn off. An American officer, with twenty volunteers, now rushed from the fort to the assistance of bis comrades, and the Indians gave way before a determined attack. The white men brought their wounded off the field ; and although two officers had been captured by the Indians, they afterwards escaped to the fort. In the fight twenty-two white men were killed anid thirty wounded. The Indians had suffered much greater loss. The warriors rallied, how- ever, and kept up an incessant fire against the fort until a heavy fog fell and night closed ini. Then with flaring torches they sought theif dead. This made them an easy mark for the soldiers, who fired on them from the fort. When daylight appeared eight or ten more bodies were found lying near the walls.",
         "ALEADER AMONG HIS PEOPLE 41 Ini july the American army was reinforced bY two thousand Kentucky volunteers under M1ajor-General Scott, and Wayne was now ,teady to strike. He manoeuvred as though li intended to attack the Miami villages to the South, but, suddenly changing his course, !Ie 1narched his troops northward, straight Ut0 the Indian settiements on the Au Glaize. \u0026t the mouth of this river, where it enters the ý4aumee, he buit Fort Defiance. dThe Indians had followed Wayne's march dOwn the Au Glaize, hovering on the flanks Of his army, and they were now mustered 8OMTe two thousand strong on the Maumee riVrer. Fron- Fort Defiance Wayne sent them 1% final offer of peace ; but, without waiting for an answer, hie marched his forces down teMaumee and encamped at the foot of the rapids, about fifteen miles from the site Of the present city of Toledo. The war chiefs of the Miami, Potawatomni, býelaware, Shawnee, Chippewa, Ottawa, and Serieca tribes held a great counicil to consider the Proposai of peace sent them by the general Of the Long Knives. Little Turtie of the )4ia1T1is advised peace. ' We have beaten the 'e twice' said he. ' We cannot expect teSame good fortune always to attend us.",
         "42 TECUJMSEH The Americans are now led by a chief who neyer sleeps. The day and night are alike to him, and he has been ever marching upofl our villages, notwithstanding the watchfulness of our young men. We have neyer been able to surprise him. Think well of it,' he cati- tioned; ' there is something that whispers to me it were well to listen to bis offers of peace.' Prof ound silence followed this speech. Theil rose Blue Jacket, the Shawnee, who corn- manded the entire Indian forces. Blue Jacket strongly favoured battle ; and bis counsel prevailed. The chiefs decided on war. A plan of action was quickly formed. TIi* Indian forces were to be drawn up in three detachments within supporting distance of each other behind the Fallen Timbers. This was a place some distance up the river froffi Wayne's encampment, where the f orest had been levelled by a hurricane, the fallen trees forming a natural barricade. On August 20, 1794, shortly after daybreaJge Wayne ordered his troops to advance. 14e was stili uncertain whether the Indians wefe hostile or friendly. But before he had prO' ceeded far bis soldiers were fired upon by body of red men secreted in the taîl grass. the battle which followed Tecumseh led the",
         "ALEADER AMONG HIS PEOPLE 43 StiaWnees, and, with two of his brothers, was In the advance-guard when the fighting began. TIIndians fought stubbornly, but to no el'rP0se. The American force of mounted VOlunteers advanced, while the infantry with n'ced bayonets drove the red men from, cover ld compelled them to retreat. In the latter Patof the action Tecumseh lost the use of hgun by having, in his excitement, rammed Sbuliet into it before putting in powder. Palli.g back until he met another body of Sha1wnees, he secured a fowling-piece, and thetl fought on bravely until again forced to týeground. In spite of his desperate efforts tra1iy his followers, the Indians were beaten 'awere fleeing in disorder through the WoOds. When night fell and the Indians stole b~kto bury or hide their dead, Tecumseh Zed on the familiar features, now fixed in %tof Sauwaseekau, his second brother to 1 battle ;and another battlefield, in which lesekau ha inlike manner beheld the 1let face of his father, arose before his 'nind. He remembered his eldest brother 's return fro the battie, with tidings that had b11ndinto his very soul, while he was yet Young to take up arms in defence of his",
         "44 TECUMSEH The Indian warriors were defeated anid scattered, and the Americans proceeded tO Iay waste their villages and cornfields in the valley of the Au Glaize. The blow to Indiall power was irrevocable. On August 3 Of the followirig year, 1795, was concluded the Treaty of Greenville, by which large tract5 of Indian territory in what are now the state5 of Ohio, Indiana, Illinois, and Michigan were surrendered to the Amer icans. The treatl was signed by Blue Jacket for the Shawneesi by Little Turtle for the Miamis, and by chiefO representing the Wyandots, the Delawares, the Ottawas, the Potawatomis, and other tribes- Tecumseh, however, had refused to attehnd Wayne's council, and when he heard fr01\"i Blue Jacket of the terms of the treaty,. lie disputed its validity. Indian land, he saide was common property; all the chiefs had riOt been consulted, and many of themn would refuse to accept the loss of their lands.",
         "CHAPTER IV THE PROPHET 'lCUMSE-H was now pondering a great plan. \"eear after year lie had seen his people pushed f\u0026rther and farther back from their streams e*nd hunting-grounds. When lie looked into th'e future, lie saw that the red race was eoOin.ed unless a strong and united effort was rQede to check this aggression. He did not aOnce take his followers into his confidence, IT4 nedtated long on a plan to gather the tribes into one great confecîeracy to oppose the eracroacliments of the whites and to pre- 'vett the extermination of the Indian race. là0ttiac, that towering figure in Indian speech d legend, was ever in lis mind. Before ~ecu Tseli\u003es birth Pontiac had formed an l'1dian confedieration against the English in nl~erica. But lis was only a temporary 11O of *the Indians, while Tecumseh planned Uflite the tribes in a great and permanent %pire.",
         "46 TECUMSEH To further his great plan of bringing about a confederation of the tribes, Tecumseh re- solved to take advantage of the superstitio0s of the people. An Indian familiar with the lore of his tribe believes hiniseif to be col\" tinually surrounded by spirits, of whose power he is in constant dread. He sees them dirnlY in visions and recognizes themn ini many sigi35 and omens-in gliding snake, flying bird, the lightning, the wind, the rustling of leaves, the noise of the tempest, the roaring cataract, the sound of thunder. To the hunter roamiiig through the forest the trees take on weird shapes, and ghostly shadows lurk in dadX defiles. At twilight he sees gnomelike figure5 dancing before him and anon swallowed iiÇ in the darkness; again he sees them, hold ing their elfin revels on some moonlit cif. Th-JO it is that the Indian imagination peoples the gloom of the ancient forests. It has been mentioned that Tecumseh haô a younger brother named Laulewasikaw, Wl1O had been born a twin, and, in consequence, would be supposed by the Indians to possess supernatural power. One day, while Lault' wasikaw was smoking in his wigwam, his piPe dropped fromn his hand, and he fell pro0e upon the ground. His body remained so loIg",
         "THE PROPHET 47 Wthout sign of life that lis friends assembled tO admi'nister the last rites for the dead. SUddenly, however, he awoke from his death- lhke trance, and arinounced to the startled nlOUrners that he had been transported to the 8IPirit-worId, where marvellous things had been revealed to him. After this lie frequently retired to secret places to hold converse with thé- Great Spirit, and from his knowledge of the Spirit-world he became an object of rever- tlICe and awe to his fellow-tribesmen. It thus came about that on the death of Periashgaan aged and influential prophet ~fthe Shawnees, this brother of Tecumseh, 1.aulewasikaw, or 'the Prophet,' was made h8 uccessor. From lis conical-shaped lodge, 'th its stout poles bound about by skins of '1I1iIT1als, the Prophet gave forth his oracles. leWas Poften consulted, and a well-worn path 800f marked the way to his abode. It was lIieved that lie could foretell the future, eveaI the haunts of animais of the chase, and ýt1fO-rix anxious inquirers about the fate of rliends He evaded impossible requests skil- 1, and by moderation in lis pretensions Was able to maintain the respect of lis t4rysuppliants. He jealously guarded in lis 101eabowl credited witl miraculous powers,",
         "48 TECUJMSEH which he claimed the Great Spirit had be-î stowed upon him. He had also a mystic torch, the gift, as he said, of ManabozhO, keeper of the sacred fire. He had also singular beit made of beans, which he assured his credulous followers had grown from hi$ flesh and would render invulnerable ai wl'O touched it. To widen his influence thec Prophet had this beit carried by IndiaO runners far and wide. Laulewasikaw, who had already manl names, now wished to be known as TenSI kwatawa, 'the Open Door,' to intimate that he was to be the deliverer of his people. U like other Indian prophets, he preached tO his followers after the manner of the whjte missionaries. Upon him, as upon Tecumselb, had descended the gif t of oratory. But hle lacked Tecumseh's dignity. He was ugl5ri and had lost an eye. On account of Ili$ dissolute habits he appeared much older thall his distinguished brother. In spite of hi$~ bad character his persuasive eloquence gained the attention of the Shawnees, and he flattereô their pride by reminding them of their ancie1t belief that they were the first people created by the Master of Life and the greatest of \u0026I his children. At Wapakoneta, on the",
         "THE PROPHET 49 Glaize, he gathered about him Shawnees, Wyancjots, Ottawas, and Senecas, and an- tlOunced himself as a bearer of new revelations froru the Master of Life. He claimed to have been taken up into the spirit-world, and that there thie veil of the future had been Iifted to He had seen the suffering of evil-doers dalso the happiness that would reward those who heeded his words. Radical ref orm, he declared, must be made in the manners of the red people. They nmust eschew ail habits learned from the whites. Linen or woollen Cohing must be replaced by the old-time bucskjin. the 'fire-stick' of the white man 4'11st be abandoned and the bow and arrow nIUIst be used in its stead ; the flesh of sheep ' IUct bullocks must no longer be eaten, but only thlat of deer and buffalo ; bread should no 'nore be made of wheat, but of Indian corn. kVery tool and custom of the whites must be relirIquished, and the Indian must return to the Ways taught by the Master of Life. The '\u003erOphet exhorted the young to help the aged q.nd the infirm; he forbade Indian women to Illternarry with the whites, since the outeome *Ould be inevitable misery; he condemned theaccursed fire-water, which had caused such e0Itention among the Indians, and threatened T. D",
         "50 TECUMSEH with never-ending flames ail those who should persist in its use. He referred in glowing terms to the boundless hunting-ground of thie red mien before the coming of the whites, and contrasted it with their rapidly narrowing territory. The Indians, he said, should hold ail their lands in cornmon. Having outlined these refornis, he declared that when the Indians had carried them out, they should enjoy the long and peaceful lives of theit ancestors and regain their ancient l-appiness. To assure his hearers of the divine charactef of his mission, he announced that power had been given hini to cure ail diseases and tO arrest death as a resuit of sickness or on the battlefield. Encouraged by the hope of regaining their iost liberty and happiness, many flocked abott the new prophet. The Kickapoos and Dela- wares believed in hini without reserve. Jj stoutest opponents were some of his oWO people, who resented the sudden rise to power and influence of one hitherto regarded witb disfavour as stupid and intemperate. Shaweneei chiefs, jealous of his position, made a plot tO overthrow him. But Tenskwatawa, as 116 was now called, turned the tables upon thele and, accusing several of his most outspokefl",
         "THE PROPHET 51 t'enmies of witchcraft, caused them to be put tO death, with torture. Ini 8o6 the governor of Indiana Territory eltan envoy to the Delawares to deliver the fOllowing message : The dark and thorny road you are now Pursuing certainly will Iead you to endless Woe and misery. And who is this pre- tended prophet, who dares to speak in the name of the Great Creator ? Examine himn. Is he more virtuous than you are Yourselves that he should be selected to Convey to you the orders of your God ? Demand of him some proof at least of being the messenger of the Deity. If God has really employed him, He has doubtless authorized him to perform Miracles, that he may be known and re- ceived as a prophet. If he is really a Prophet, ask him to cause the sun to stand stili, the moon to alter its course, the rivers to cease to flow, or the dead to rise from their graves. If he does these things, You may then believe that he has been sent fromn God. I reply to this unexpected attack Tens- k'*atawa assured his followers that he would",
         "52 TECUMSEH give thema convincing prOOf of his being the true messenger of the Great Spirit, and he boldly predicted that on a certain day lie would draw a veil of darkness over the suil* Many Indians assembled to witness the test of his supernatural power. If it succeeded, it would establish his position beyond doubt; if it failed, the faith of his followers would be sadly shaken. Scoffers pointed to the bright' ness of the summer sun, and openly questioned the power of the Prophet to dim its rays* Believers furtively watched the entrance 0 the Prophet's lodge, which was decorated with strange symbols. From it at the tin'ie appointed the familiar form of the one-eyed wizard emerged, clad in his prophet's robe with outspread raven's wings. At his appeaf' ance the noonday brilliance of the sun begall to wane. Sudden silence fell upon the awe struck throng, and faces took on a look O fear as the darkness deepened about the1l' The Prophet's voice thrilled through 018 gloom. ' Did I not prophesy truly ? Beholdt darkness has shrouded the sun.' The aP' parent miracle convinced many unbelieVetS and established the influence of Tenskwataw$ more strongly than ever. The Indians wefe completely deceiveFi. The achievement hd",
         "THE PROPHET 53 'Of course, a very simple explanation : the Prophet had overheard some white mission- aries predicting an eclipse of the sun, and had I'3ed this information very adroitly for his Purpose. In April 1807 some four hundred redskins had gathered near Greenville, ready to do the Prophet's bidding. Tenskwatawa and 'ecumnseh were invited by Captain Wells, the Indian agent at Fort Wayne, to visit the fort with a few chiefs, to learn the news con- talined in a recent letter from the president 'Of the Seventeen Fires.' Tecumseh peremp- torily commanded the messenger to ' go back tO Port Wayne and tell Captain Wells that 'y fire is kindled on the spot appointed by the Great Spirit above, and, if he has anything t0 Communicate to nme, he must come here ; 1Shall expect him in six days from this ttlie.' At the time appointed the messenger tetUrned, bearing a copy of a letter fromn the nited States government, in which recuniseh and his followers were charged Wath stili occupying land that had passed 0U f their possession by the Treaty of 'Thle United States. Four new states had been added to the etiiai thirteen, making, in Indian ternis, seventeen Council",
         "54 TECUMSEH Greenville. Tecumseh vented his feelings il' vehement speech. These lands are ours, and no one has the right to remove us, because we were the first owners ; the Great Spirit above ha$ appointed this place for us on which tO light our fires, and here we will remain- As to boundaries, the Great Spirit above knows no boundaries, nor wilI His red people know any. . . . If my great father, the President of the Seventeen Fires, ha$ anything more to say to me, he must send a man of note as his messenger; I will hold no further intercourse witl Captain Wells. The American settiers saw with increasiflg anxiety the unending stream of Indians 011 their way to the Prophet. The strange gar' of many of them denoted that they had journeyed from distant regions. Runnef5 continually passed to and fro, bearing pipeS and beits of wampum from tribe to tribe, Council fires were frequently kindled. It wa-5 commonly believed that this unwonted activ' ity was due to the secret plottings of British agents from Canada. By the autumn of 1807 the Prophet had assembled near Greenville",
         "THE PROPHET 55 about eight hundred Indians, many of whom '#ere equipped with new rifles. On September 12 came two commissioners; ferm the goverrior of Ohio. These were re- eeived by the Indians in a friendly manner, arid a council was immediately called to hear their message. The governor, the commis- 8ioflers said, desired to know why so many 1fldians were gathered on land no longer theirs. lewished to remind the Indians of their forrrner relations with the Seventeen Fires, afld of the importance of remaining neutral in teevent of war with the British. After hear- '119 the commissioners the council adjourned 11ntil the following day, when Blue Jacket, WIhG was unanimously chosen to voice the 8eIimn of his people, spoke as follows: Brethren, we are seated who heard You yesterday. You will get a true relation as far as we and our connections Can give it, who are as follows : Shawnees, Wyandots, Potawatomis, Tawas, Chippe- was, Winnepaus, Malominese, Malockese, Sacawgoes, and one more from the north of the Chippewas. Brethren, you see aUl these men sitting before you, who now sPeak to you.",
         "TECUMSEH About eleven days ago we [the IndiansJ had a council, at which the tribe of Wyan- dots [the eider brother of the red people] spoke and said God had kindied a fire anid ail sat around it. In this council we taiked over the treaties with the French and the Americans. The Wyandot said the Frerich formeriy marked a line along the AiieghanY mountains, southeriy, to Charleston. NO man was to pass it from either side. Whel the Americans came to settie over the uine, they toid the Indians to unite and drive off the French, until the war came on betweel the British and the Americans, when it was told them that King George, by bis officers, directed them to unite and drive the Americans back. After the treaty of peace between the Engiish and Americans, the summer before Wayne's army came out, the British heid a council with the Indians and toid thern if they wouid turn out and unite as one mari, they might surround the Americans like deer in a ring of fire and destroy themn all- The Wyandot spoke further in the councili We see, said he, there is like to be was between the Engiish and our white bret1l' ren, the Americans. Let us unite andô",
         "THE PROPHET 5 Consider the suifferings we have undergone, frorn interfering in the wars of the Eng- lish. They have often promised to help us, and at last when we could not with- stand the army that came against us, and Went to the English fort for refuge,' the English told us, ' I cannot let you in; you are painted too much, my children.' It Was then we saw the British deait treacher- ously with us. We now see them going to war again. We do not know what they are going to fight for. Let us, my breth- ren, not interfere, was the speech of the Wyandot. Further, the Wyandot said, I speak to You, my littie brother, the Shawnees at Greenville, and to you our littie brothers ail around. You appear to be at Green- Ville to serve the Supreme Ruler of the Universe. Now send forth your speeches to ail our brethren far around us, and let us unite to seek for that which shall be for our eternal welf are, and unite our- selves in a band of perpetual brotherhood. li is referring to what happened in x794 at the Falleii 'nbers. There was a British post on the Maumee flot far ý111the scene cf the battie. At tis time, it will be remembered, %etOit and other western posts, which passed to the United t\u0026tslf in796, were still held by the British.",
         "58 TECUMSEH These, brethren, are the sentiments of ail the men who sit around you : they ai1 adhere to what the eider brother, the Wyandot, bas said, and these are theif sentiments. It is not that they are afraid of their white brethren, but that they desire peace and barmony, and not that tbeit white brethren could put them to great necessity, for their former arms were bows and arrows, by wbich tbey got their living- The Prophet then arose and launcbed fortil into one of the lengthy harangues so familiar to bis followers. Tbree years ago, be said, be bad been called upon by powers be could not disobey to follow the course whicb had been revealed to bim by tbe Great Spirit. 111 accordance witb this divine guidance be bad earnestly endeavoured ever since to teacl the Indians bow to live sober, industrious, and peaceful lives. He had been persecuted b3t chiefs of bis own tribe wbo bad refused tO listen to bis preacbing. He bad been driveO from bis own village. But tbe Great Spirit bad directed him to this place, wbicb the Americans now claimed as their own. Herelle desired to remain, not for the value of theC land or the natural beauty of the surrounding0y",
         "THE PROPHET 59 but to obey the divine command, and by his exeniplary life to prove to the complete SaItisfaction of the white people his genuine ho0nesty of purpose. By this adroit speech the Prophet succeeded in allaying suspicion, fLnd thus under the guise of peace and religion Tecumnseh was enabled to continue his pre- Parations for war. When the council had tertninated, Tecumseh, Blue Jacket, Round- hea, and Panther accompanied the messengers tO Chillicothe, then the capital of Ohio, and 't88ured the governor of their peaceful inten- tions towards the Americans.",
         "CHAPTER V A GIFTED ORATOR INDIAN oratory, like that of most savage races, is poetical and picturesque in thoughIt and expression. It abounds in imagery and is not without touches of pathos and humour, The unlettered Indian has no rich store of written history from which to draw his illus- trations. He takes them froin Nature's ever' open book-the sheitered lake, the winding stream, the storm-swept forest-and from -the Iegendary lore of his tribe. Tecumseh was one of the most renowned of a race of orator-s- The stately Algonquian language displayed it5 greatest beauty when spoken by him. Nis eloquence flowed as freely as a mighty rivet, or again, thundering like a cataract, it swept everything along on its tempestuous tide. Tecumseh's speech can neyer reach our ears; we cannot see the Iight flash from his hazel eye or the smile play upon his bronzed cheel\" We cannot watch his graceful gestures. J1i5",
         "A GIFTED ORATOR 61 Personai presence we may not feel ; but behind liS recorded words we are stili awaxe of living force and power. We can picture his maniy forrn in its simple attire, as he paces up and clown, dominating his hearers by his persuasive 8Peech, convincing their reason, controlling their judgment, compeliing their action. None ktiew the untaught and unteachabie art of oratory better than Tecumseh. Throughout hi life it ever piayed an important part, from 'lis first outburst, which was in defence of a heîpîess captive, until his last appeal to the courage of a British generai. Tecumseh~ Requitted himself gallantly upon the field o battie, where he was always conspicuous for h8courage ; but in the council-chamber there were aiso batties to be fought, in which Words were weapons, and there Tecumseh was 110 less conspicuous and successfui. After the arrivai of the commissioners and hIdian chiefs at Chillicothe the governor sum- n1oned them to a great council. Tecumseh 'e8e to speak on behaif of the red men. Upon hMwas centred the attention of ail. He 8POke for three hours, during which he heid ý'8 listeners spellbound. He assured them that it was far from his intention to take up the hatchet against the pale-face, but that he",
         "62 TECUMSEH would sternly resist any trespass upon hi$ people's rights. Rapidly reviewing ail the treaties between the western tribes and thle whites, he boldly denied the validity of tlie Treaty of Greenville. At the same time, lie pleaded for conciliation and peace. His speech made a great impression. The governor's fear of an uprising at Greenville was allayede and the militia, which had been hastily surn, moned, were dismissed. Tecumseh's oratory was called into plaY again in the autumn of 1807, when the Americans were thrown into a state of terrOt by the murder of a white man near the site of the present town of Urbana. This deed of violence, coupled with the constant increase of the Prophet's band at Greenville, caused.the wildest alarm among the settiers. Tecumseh and his brother disclainied ail knowledge of thie murder, which had been committed by son'le wandering Indians, and they agreed to attenld a council at Springfield to reassure the white5- The Indians who attended the council we(e asked to lay aside their arms. Tecumseh haughtily refused, thinking it unbecoming the dignity of a warrior chief. When the request was repeated, the wily Indian replied that bis tomahawk was also his pipe and that he miglit",
         "A GIFTED ORATOR 63 Wish to smoke. Thercupon a gaunt American aIdvanced and offered Tecumseh his own pipe. Taicing the earthen bowl with its long stem hi8o his fingers, Tecumseh eyed it curiously ; hSgaze then travelled to the owner, who 8tGOd haif fearful of the resuit of this off er. binwith an indignant gesture the chief tOssed the pipe into the bushes behind him. 140thing more was said about the tomahawk. .The council was held in the shade of spread- \"r1g rnaples. The chiefs and their warriors ranIged themselves in a semicircle on the grass. The Pipe of peace slowly made its round in token of goodwill. Several chiefs spoke in tUn'expressing the pacific intentions of the hIdians. Tecumseh referred to the recent t4Urder, and denied that it had been the act of any of the tribes under his influence. He eý*PIained that the motive for the gathering of 80 mnany red men at Greenville was purely religious, and that ail were friendly towards the whites. His words and manner again tarried conviction, and the council terminated IDeacefully. The Americans, however, stili continued to regard the Prophet's settlement at Greenville ea real menace. During the sanie autunn \u003cq'eIe another message to ail the tribes under",
         "64 TECUMSEH the Prophet's influence from the governot of the territory of Indiana, William Henfl Harrison, afterwards president of the United States, and an active and successful leader of the Americans in the War of 1812. The message closed with these words : My children, I have heard bad news- The sacred spot where the great council fire was kindled, around which the Sevei, teen Fires and ten tribes of their childrell smoked the pipe of peace-that very spot where the Great Spirit saw His red and white children encircle themnselves with the chain of friendship,-that place has beeO selected for dark and bloody counicils. »41 children, this business must be stopped' You have called in a number of men fro1n the most distant tribes, to listen to a fool, who speaks not the words of the Great Spirit, but those of the devil and of the British agents. My children, your cotl' duct has much alarrned the white settlefs near you. They desire that you will sezld away those people, and if they desire tO have the impostor with them, they iniai carry him. Let him go to the lakes;l can hear the British more distinctly.",
         "A GIFTED ORATOR 6 Tecumseh was absent from Greenville when this message was received, and it fell to the Prophet to make a reply. He was sorry, he SG81d, that his father listened to the advice of bad birds. He denied that the Indians had el'Y intercourse with the British, or that they iclsired anything but peace and to hear the \"lordIs of the Great Spirit. 7Parly in the spring of i8o8 Tecumseh and the Prophet, with their band of followers, left Greenville and set out in a westerly direction, eeross what is now the state of Indiana. Land hc been granted to them by the Potawatomis 8IC1 ICickapoos on the banks of the Tippecanoe, Ilear its junction with the Wabash, and here theY intended to make a new town, which 8hOuld be the headquarters of their proposed CtOnfederacy No more desirable spot could haire been chosen. It was almost central in relation to the tribes they were endeavouring to bring together, and it had convenient com- 4'11nication with Lakce Erie by means of the Welbash and Maumee rivers, and with Lake ý4'ehigan and the Illinois country by way of th Trippecanoe and other connecting waters. Otl oe side an almost impenetrable stretch Of Wilderness formed a natural defence. Froni T.",
         "66 TECUMSEH this position, also, Tecumseh was able to watch carefully the country from which he wished to exclude white settlers. The Prophet's influence soon extended among the neighbouring tribes, and t1e American authorities again became aiarmed, the more so0 as they learned that among lis followers warlike sports were now beiflg practised along with religious rites. TO counteract the effect of such reports thie Prophet sent a message to Governor HarrisOl\" to say that he had been misrepresented, arid followed it up by a personal visit along wîit' a number of his followers, to explain Ili$ attitude towards the Americans. The visit lasted for a f ortnight and frequent conferenCe5 took place between Harrison and the Prophct' The governor also questioned many of tbe Indians, but could learn nothing from the0' derogatory to their leader. Desiring to kilO' to what extent the Prophet's teachings Col\" trolled his followers, he tempted them WWt liquor, but they remained true to their VOI\u003c of total abstinence. Before taking his leave Tenskwatawa t10 addressed himself to the governor: 1 told ail the redskins, that the \u0026",
         "A GIFTED ORATOR 67 they were in was not good, and that they ought to abandon it. That we ought to Consider ourselves as one man ; but we OUght to live agreeably to our several Customs, the red people after their mode, anid the white people after theirs ; par- ticularly that they should not drink Whisky; . . . do not take up the toma- hawk should it be offered by the British, or by the Long Knives ; do not meddle With anything that does not belong to you, but mind your own business and cultivate the ground, that your women and your Children may have enough to live on. 1 now inform. you, that it is our inten- tion to live in peace with our father and hi3 people for ever. rhsharangue ended with the customary eggîflg for presents, after which the Prophet 'ýIç his company took their departure. Meanwhile Governor Harrison was planning tak more territory from the Indians and a'k' it to the United States. By a treaty with 4reof the tribes made at Fort Wayne on Se te ner 30, i809, he obtained a tract of 'IbOut three million acres, extending nearly ui hun red miles on each side of the Wabash.",
         "68 TECUMSEH By this treaty the Indians found that theY were deprived of much of their best huntingl ground. Their indignation rose to fighti1g pitch, and many who had been holding bac1' now accepted Tecumseh's scheme of a great confedieration by means of which they miglite with some hope of success, battle for thli rights. The powerful Wyandots, keepers Of the great wampumn beit of tribal union, turned to the Prophet. Many of the lesser tribes followed their example, and refused te re' cognize the American claimns to this newlY ceded territory. For lands acquired undef varicus treaties, the Indians were receivilg from the Americans certain annuities il goods. That year, when their annual portiOn' of sait arrived at Tippecanoe, the Indiaffi refused to take it and drove the boatnIeO away. They accused the Americans cf d6' ception, demanding that the land should be given back, and that no more should be taCeO without the unanimoUS consent of ail tbe tribes. War between the British and the Amierica0o now seemed inevitable, and everything -poiDted to an alliance between the British and tb' Indians cf Tecumseh's confederacy. BritiOb interests requ.ired that the confederacy shoUlé",
         "A GIFTED ORATOR 6 InOt be weakened by premature outbreaks. Gifts of clothing, food, and weapons were lavýishly bestowed upon Tecumseh, who was eflCouraged to unite the tribes, but not to leclare war until word came fromn Canada. ,My son,' said a British agent, ' keep your eyes Fied on me; my tomahawk is now up; be YO ready, but do not strike until I give the Thie governor of Indiana, desiring to learn the Prophet's strength and, if possible, to avert War, sent the following message to Tippe- There is yet but littie harmn done, which May be easily repaired. The chain of friendship, which united the whites with the Indians, may be renewed and be as song as ever. A great deal of that work depends on you-the destiny of those who are under your direction depends upon the choice you may makre of the two roads which are before you. The one is large, open and pleasant, and leads to Peace, security, and happiness; the other, On the contrary, is narrow and crooked, and leads to misery and ruin. Do not de- Ceive yourselves ; do not believe that ail",
         "70 TECUMSEH the nations of Indians united are able tO resist the force of the Seventeen Fires. 1 know your warriors are brave, but oufS are not less so ; and what can a f ew brave warriors do against the innumerable warriors of the Seventeen Fires ? OUt blue coats are more numerous than y011 can count ; our hunters are like the leaves of the forest, or the grains of sand on tbe Wabash. Do not think the red coats can protect you ; they are not able to protect thei' selves. They do not think of going tO war with us. If they did, you would in -' few moons see our fiag wave over ail the forts of Canada. To this the Prophet made no direct reply-, bt said that Tecumseh, as his representatiTe, would visit the governor shortly. True to this promise, early in August 1810? Tecumseh, with four hundred warriors gf'O' tesquely painted for the occasion, swept do\"'O the Wabash in canoes. Captain Lloyd, theO at Fort Knox, writes of their passing: The Shawanoe Indians have corne; tbey passed this garrison, which is three ie above Vincennes, on Sunday iast, in eighty",
         "A GIFTED ORATOR 71 canmes. They were ail painted ini the most terrific manner. They were stopped at the garrison by me, for a short time. 1 examined their canoes and found them well prepared for war, in case of an attack. They were headed by the brother of the Prophet (Tecumseh), who, perhaps, is one Of the finest-looking men I ever saw - about six feet high, straight, with large, fine features, and altogether a daring, bold- looking fellow. The governor 's council with them will commence to-morrow morning. Tecumseh and his warriors encamped at 'Vicennes, the capital at that time of the terrtory of Indiana, where many had êt8sernbled for the council, which was fixed fer August 12. At the hour appointed *rcurnseh, attended by forty followers, pro- ýeecled to the governor's house. Seated in 8talte on the portico was the governor, sur- rOunded by judges of the Supreme Court, Ofcers, and citizens. About forty yards from the house Tecumseh halted abruptly. 'ninterpreter advanced with the request that t'chief and his warriors should takre seats OI11 the portico. To this Tecumseh signified 8trtDng disapproval, saying that he preferred a",
         "72 TECUMSEH neighbouring grove. The governor objected that there were no chairs there. 'The eartIl is my mother, and on her bosomn will I repose,' was the rej oinder. The chief carried his point, and chairs for the governor and his suite wefe removed to the grove. Tecumseh put forth ail the powers of hi$ eloquence. He traced the course of relations between the two races from the time whe0l only the moccasined foot of the red man trod the wiiderness. He depicted vividly the evils suiffered by his race since their first contact with the whites. The ruthless destruction of his birthplace, the sufferings of his childhood, the conflicts of his early manhood-all the$£' he passed over in rapid review. And he closed his address by contending that the Treaty Of Fort Wayne was illegai, since it had not beeil agreed to by ail the tribes, who constituted 0 single nation and who had joint ownership iO the land. Governor Harrison in his replY disputed Tecumseh's statement that ail the Indians were of one nation, using as his maill argument the fact that they spoke differelit tongues. He contended that if the Miarnis desired to seil their land, the Shawnees Iiaô no right to interfere. On the following dal he inquired whether Tecumseh intended tO",
         "A GIFTED ORATOR 73 Drevent a survey of the disputed land. The ehief replied that it was the intention of the 'tfited tribes to recognize the old boundary \"111Y, and that, while he had no desire to erovoke war, he would oppose further aggres- S1O'l. If the Americans gave up this land, he WOeUld serve them faithfully ; if not, he would \"as8t in his lot with the British. The governor erOmlised to notify the president of Tecumseh's Viws, without holding out much prospect of a e'eso.to surrender the land to its former 0Wners. « Well,' returned Tecumseh, ' as the great Chief is to decide the niatter, I hope the Great %Pirit will put enough sense into his head to \"'dluce him to direct you to give up this land. 't is true he is so far off he will not be injured bthe war; he may sit stili in his town and rlilc his wine, while you and I shall have to ght it out., In the following spring (1811z), when the \u0026nericans were distributing the annuity of 'elt to the Kickapoos and Shawnees, the 1r0phet's Indians at Tippecanoe, on being offered their share of five barrels, forcibly se'Zecl the whole boat-load. This angered the '\u0026rericans, who were further incensed by the znurcjer on the Missouri of four white men",
         "74 TECUMSEH by two Indians of the Potawatomi tribe. Tecumseh, who was absent at the time either on a hunting expedition or for the purpose of strengthening his confederation, was surn' moned to Vincennes shortly after his returil. He arrived on JuiY 27, attended by a partY of three hundred warriors. The governor re- ferred to the recent seizure of the sait by the Prophet's warriors and demanded an explafla' tion. Tecumseh replied that it was indeed difficuit to please the governor, since lie, seemed equally annoyed if the sait were tacell or rejected. When asked to deliver un tlue Indians guilty of the murder, he replied that he had no jurisdiction over them, since thel were not of his town. The white people, 116 said, were needlessly alarmed at his activ8e measures in uniting the northern tribes; fOr' he was but following the exaniple which tlle Seventeen Fires had set hini when they joined the Fires in one confederacy, and Ile boldiy declared that he would endeavour als0 to unite the various tribes of the south wit1 those of the north. The land question Ile hoped would be left in abeyance until 11'5 return in the spring.",
         "CHAPTER VI THE BATTLE OF TIPPECANQE TECUMSEH was soon on his southern journey, W\"ith twenty warriors to aid in the work which W1S 0w apparently nearing completion. In- 8Pired by patriotic zeal, he passed fromn tribe tOJ tribe, incessantly active. Through dismai 8watrIps and across wide plains he made his Waly, and in his light canoe shot many a dan- eeroDUs rapid. He laboured diligently among th Indians to make them sensible of their 'err0ngs and induce them to sink their petty tribal jealousies in a grand and noble patriot- ~S1.He braved the dangers and difficulties Wfvinter travel over the crusted snow and through the wh-ite f orests. From sunrise to '%'4Qset he journeyed, passing from camp-fire tOCamnp.fire, binding together the scattered ttibes by the fire and force of his eloquence. itl Tecumseh's absence the Prophet reigned OtTippecanoe, performing his mysterious rit.,S, seeing visions, and dreamîing dreams. 75",
         "76 TECUMSEH Indians fromn the most remote tribes wefO drawn by tales of his niiraculous deeds to thiO chosen seat of the Great Spirit, the centre from which radiated the Prophet's influence, The ever-increasing number of red men there assembling was evidence also of the success of Tecumseh's miss ion. The Americans had heard with uneasiness bis bold avowal before starting on bis southern journey, and theif alarm, was increased by the reports fr00n Harrison 's spies, posted near the Prophet's town. On August 7, 181 1, the United States government demanded the surrender of a» Indians who were in any way connected with the murder of American citizens, and threatened to exterrninate those tribes whicll raised the hatchet. In response the Prophet promised to comply with the president'O demands, and reiterated bis earnest desire tO avert war. But, in spite of such pacific prO' testing, the Indians continued their acts 0 hostility. Some horses were stolen, and tlO thieves were tracked to Tippecanoe. T110 owners hastened thither to reclaim their PrO' perty, and on nearing the town were fired upOO by Indians. Similar incidents were commO'l Harrison was well aware of the importanit",
         "THE BATTLE 0F TIPPECANQE 77 fiuid extensive nature of the work in which Tecumseh was engaged, and viewing with elarmn the rapid growth of the confederation 'I the western frontier, he resolved on action. he destruction of Tippecanoe would be of the utmost strategic importance, but, if such \u0026 drastic measure were determined upon, it W*Ould have to be accomplished before Te- euMiseh's return. On the other hand, the elrsident's comnmands had been to maintain Peace. The governor reconciled the two op- leO8ing courses of action by the thought that a lar1ge army advancing upon the Indians might ititirnidate them into submission. Failing that,) the alternative war became inevitable. Onl October 5 Harrison set out from Vin- CelhItes with over one thousand men. This erMIY encamped for a brief period on the Wabash, where the city of Terre Haute now 'tands, and erected a fort which, in honour of Sh leader, was named Fort Harrison. Leav- \"'g about one hundred men as a guard, liarrison, with the remaining nine hundred, \"\"tOut for Tippecanoe on October 29. Two '*'ell -worn trails made by the Prophet's disciples led along the Wabash, one on either 8Side of the river. Harrison chose that along thle eastern side, then f orded the river and",
         "78 TECUMSEH struck the other trail. He safely crossed the dangerous pass at Pine Creek, where f at-Il havoc had been wrought upon the troops Of General Harmar. Worn out by their tedioUs and difficuit march, the soldiers encamped 0I0 the evening of November 5 within ten miles of the Prophet's headquarters. Next rnorniflg they were early on the march; and, aftef having gone about five miles, they sighted a party of reconnoitririg Indians, with whoffi they endeavoured to communicate, but thle red men ignored their advances and assurned an unfriendly attitude. Within a mile and 0 half of the town several of the officers in\"l patiently urged an imniediate attack; but 0S the president's commands were to keep peace as long as possible, Harrison decided to selô an officer with a small guard to arrange'for \u0026 conference. This overture, however, did nOt succeed; the Indians were hostile, and eVel' made an attempt to capture the officer alld his men. And Harrison then ordered WO' army to advance upon the town. Suddenly three Indians appeared, maIcill9 their way directly towards the arniy. The Prophet's chief counsellor, with two intef' preters, had corne to demand the reason 0 this warlike advance. Peace, they declafeô'",
         "THE BATTLE 0F TIPPECANOE 79 'ea their one desire. With much gesticula- tiOti they explained that messages to that eflect had been sent by certain chiefs, who nIust have taken the other trail and so niissed the general of the Seventeen Fires. The Rovernor agreed to suspend hostilities in order thaIt terms of peace might be arranged in cUelon the following day, and then set h18 nen in motion towards Tippecanoe. This ýtI0oked-for action startled the Indians, who litIMediately assumed the defensive. The eOýVerflor, however, assured them that he had \"0 hostile intentions, and asked whether there ý'e8a near-by stream by the side of which hi8 troops might encamp. He was directed to 'l ereek about a mile distant which ran through the Prairie to the north of the town. Thither teAmnericans at once proceeded, and finding it a mnost desirable camping - ground, the 801ldiers were soon busily engaged in pitching their tents and gathering brushwood to make Ref or the November air was chili. Although ~attack was anticipated, Harrison arranged camp as if expecting battie, and posted 8'ound it a thin lino of sentries. *r 1rkness fell upon the two encampments. Tihe Weary soldiers were sleeping on their rtnls ; the Prophet and his counsellors sat",
         "80 TECUMSEH about their council fire, eager and alert, earnestly discussing the situation. Tecumseh'O parting injunction had been to maintaili peace at ai hazards until his return. Bt the Prophet saw himself surrounded by il\" trepid warriors who would dare anything at his command, and his ambition was sorelY tempted. In point of numbers his force W$$ equal to that of the Americans, and tbe latter, moreover, were without the protectiOO of fortifications. Visions of certain victod passed before his mind. He was stili smartillg from Harrison's stinging message to the tribeS five years before, and net too well plea-Sed with Tecumseh's rising faine, which threateled to eclipse his own. Moved by these thougt5l the Prophet yielded to the counsel of bio boldest warriors and decided upon battle. Hurried preparations were then made to take the enemy by surprise. There was 1 moon and the sky was clouded. Nature herstif apparently was aiding the Prophet's plOo' Ail being ready, he concocted some charled fluid, over which he muttered curious i11ciO tations. He assured his credulous followeO that haîf the enemy were mad and the 0 mainder dead; and he solemnly 1pronise them that bullets would glance harmlessly",
         "THE BATTLE OF TIPPECANOE 81 'rOna their own bodies. The superstitious 11dians' thus excited to an intense pitch of rehigj0us fanaticism, were prepared to, dare \"uYthing. Shortiy before daylight on November 7 the Whl'e Inclian force crept stealthily through the grass towards the fires of Harrison's camp. rib ush that precedes the dawn was broken 0'WY by the soft patter of rain. A watchful 8ettinl discerned in the dawning light the Slectre4like form of the foremost savage. He 14red at once, and the shot roused the sleeping ean.It told the Indians that they werc 4\"5COvered, and with wild war-whoops they r4shed against the American position. The tneof sentries was quickly broken through; ''tthe soldiers sprang to arms; camp-fires Weetrodden out; and Indians and whites frjlhlt furiously in the darkness. Perched 4oh Safe eminence, the Prophet looked down hute fght, chanting bis war-song further ite the savages, and rattling deers' hoofs 'lignl for advance or retreat. Under the eneof their fierce fanaticism the Indians one behe usual practice of fighting ,,Pjehndcover, and braved the enemy in Conflict. In spite of Tenskwatawa's OPecies, the Ainerican bullets wrought",
         "82 TECUMSEH deadly havoc among the warriors, whOs seeing that they had been deceived, begaO to waver. Finally, the Indians gave W\u0026Y bef ore a terrific charge and fled to tb6 woods, while the soldiers applied the torcb to their village. On the head of the Prophet fell the blaffO for this disastrous reverse. ' You are a liast said a Winnebago chief to his former s-pirituý adviser, ' for you told us that the white peoPle were ail dead or crazy, when they wereW their right mind and fought like the devO*' The Prophet vainly endeavoured t:o giqe reasons for the failure of his prophecyp was, he declared, ail due to some errof compounding his concoction ; but the wizaX'ý rod was broken, his mysterious influe0Ie shattered. His radiant visions of power 110 vanished in the smoke of battle, and he 5lipped back into the oblivion from which he had 50 suddenly sprung. Meanwhile Tecumseh was pursuing mission with determination and vigour. AfteS travelling many weary miles, he turned aggo homeward, pleased with his success, h thoughts soaring hopefully as he neared tbe little town which owed its existence tohi But he arrived there to find his headquafto",
         "THE BATTLE 0F TIPPECANOE 83 lenlished, bis followers disbanded, his brother humiliated. Hardest of ail to, bear 'els the knowledge that bis own brother, on Wýhose co-operation he had so firrnly relied, had( caused this great disaster to bis people. The Prophet's miserable excuses so enraged hjM that he seized him by the bair and shook hrlviolently. Tecumseh mused upon bis Years of patient and careful organization, and thOught sorrowfully of his town, so laboriously fortified, and peopled at the cost of SQ many d\"IIgers'risked and privations endured. It W\"8a blow almost too great to be borne. ShouId he accept it as a total defeat and b4no is purpose P No 1 The courageous C0f P as be stood amid the charred remains t ippecanoe, resolved to persevere in his 8truggle for the freedomn cf his race. hl recurnseh now informed the governor of '~retur and expressed bis willingness to the president of the United States. tçjtl ssion was granted him to go to, Wasbing- i4, i a stipulated that he mxust do so ttee .This offended Tecumseh's pride 4ilgity. He was the most powerful ~erican Indian living, with five thousand Ilvarriors at his command; holding in one hand i4Ilance witb Great Britain, and in the",
         "84 TECUMSEH other an alliance with the Indians of the south-west. Such was the position hie had reached, and hie intended to maintain it. Was so great a chief, ruler over a confederacl similar to that of the white man, to visit the chief of the Seventeen Fires without a retinue 1 No 1 He haughtily refused to go to Wahing' ton under such conditions. In the early spring of 1812 two settiers WeM put to death near Fort Dearborn, sevefW others near Fort Madison, and a whole fanly was murdered near Vincennes. These aCto of violence threw the settiers into a paI1ic A general Indian rising was feared ; but at0 critical moment Tecumseh attended a gralli council at Mississinewa, on the Waba0\" between Tippecanoe and Fort Wayneal succeeded in calming the excited fears of t08 Americans. He was not yet prepared fOj open war. On this occasion, in the courseO his address, he said : Governor Harrison made war on 0 people in my absence; it was the will 0' the Great Spirit that he should do so. hope it will please the Great Spirit the white people may let us live in pe\u0026'e we will not disturb them, neither have 1",
         "THE BATTLE 0F TIPPECANOE 8,5 done it, except when they came te our 'village with the intention of destroying us. We are happy to state to your brothers present, that the unfortunate transaction that took place between the white people and a few cf our men at our village has been settled between us and Governor Harrison ; and I wilI further state, had I been at home, there would have been no blood shed at the time. mpeaking of the recent murders, Tecumseh ~d he greatly regretted that the ill-wiil cf he Arnericans should be exercised upon his 0110wers when the Potawatomis, over whom e l'ad ne power, alone were guilty. T10 a message from the British agent \"eumseh replied : You tell us te retreat or turn te one side 8hould the Long Knives corne against us. liad I been at home in the late unfortunate affair [the attack on Tippecanoe] I should have done se, but those I left at home were (cannot caîl them men) a poor set of People, and their scuffle with the Long knfives I compare te a struggle between little children, who only scratch each other 's",
         "86 TECUMSEH faces. The Kickapoos and Winnebagoes have since been at Post Vincennes and settled the matter amicably. If Tecumseh regarded the Tippecanoe battie lightly, the An-ericans considered it a serio05 event. It was magnified into an importahtt victory, and cited to rouse feelings of enmitY against Great Britain, whose agents wete held to be responsible for the conduct O the Indiaris. Occurring at a crisis of affaits' it was made a strong argument for a declara' tion of war against England. When june came Tecumseh demarlded ammunition from the Indian agent at WO Wayne. The agent presented many reasoll why the chief should now become friendly t\" the Seventeen Fîres. Tecumseh listenedàwt indifference. He then bitterly expressed W resentment at Governor Harrison 's advalce in his absence, and maintained his right to b lands the Americans had invaded, but he Stil declared that he had no intention of taleio up arms against the United States. The agenlt refused the ammunition. 1 My British fatbe' will not deny me; to him will I go,' retotee Tecumseh.",
         "CHAPTER VII UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG flOw leave the Wabash for the Detroit, \"'ICI the interior of Indiana for the frontiers of Canada. Early in june 1812 Tecumseh, ia small band of chosen warriors, left his tea.and set out through the forest for th ritish post at Amherstburg on the Cariadjan side of the Detroit river, solemnly VOwng flot to bury the tomahawk until the I nives were humbled. At Amherstburg SO 8ught out Colonel Matthew Elliott, the ckladian superintendent of Indian Affairs, ~1iformally pledged his allegiance to the '~of Great Britain. In front of Fort 1%l1nat Amherstburg, near the mouth of the etroit river, lay Bois Blanc Island, upon several blockhouses had been erected. Th8island was fixed upon as the head- ql'tters of the Indians, and here Tecumseh et( iS warriors encamped. The fidelity of the great chief was put to the 87",
         "88 TECUMSEH- test even before active hostilities began. band of neutral Indians, encaxnped at Brown$ town, on the American side, opposite Amherst' burg, invited him to a council they were abouit to hold. His decision was quickly made. He had cast in his lot with the British auid would not falter in his allegiance. 1 No,' lie replied to the runner that awaited his answef; 'I1 will suifer my bones to bleach upon t1his shore before I engage in any council of netl trality.' He soon gave proof of his sinceritl by leading his intrepid littie band in one of the initial engagements of the war, an engagemenit as we shall learn, of the greatest importance in this early stage of the conflict. Tecumseh had taken his stand for 01e coming war : the flag of Britain should be lliO flag, and her soldiers his comrades-in--arfis, To him, indeed, it was that Britain owed be Indian allies in the War of 1812. CanadiaO$ and Indians stood side by side in face of \u00264 common peril and were inspired by a comnmO1 purpose. To Canada defeat meant absorptiOO in the United States and the loss of nationl life; to the red men it meant expulsion frOO1 their homes and hunting-grounds and tbe ultimate extinction of their race. Long before the formai declaration of WO",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG 89 by the United States (June 18, z812) the in- eOeitable conflict had been foreseen. The berriocrats, then in power in the United States, *ere determined, to have it. To many Amern- %a 8it appeared as a necessary sequel to the thersuto a second War of Independence; t' thrsit seemed a short and easy means Of adin to the United States that northern terIritory, the inhabitants of which had re- f Itd the opportunity to join the Thirteen COlonie in the War of the Revolution. But tt ecauses of this unhappy war are too com- Pleand manifold to be discussed here.' Canda' position at the opening of hostili- te as far from reassuring. The population \"etBritish North America was only haif a rqlinof whites at most, as compared with hbu eight million in the United States. Great jltain was engaged elsewhere in a life-and- etath struggle and could spare but few troops th aSIPPort the Canadian militia. Indeed, ere were flot fifteen hundred British soldiers kb't1 the whole Canadian frontier; while, even befre the declaration of war, to Detroit alone 4'lbeen dispatched more than two thousand fo..ercan troops. The Americans had, there- 1e reasonable grounds for confidence in the 1see The War with the United States in this Seriez.",
         "go TECUMSEH ultimate resuit, notwithstanding a somewhat depleted treasury and the opposition of ' considerable party in the northern, especialll the New England, States. Canadians' ho«' ever, loyally answered the cail to arrns, aidô proved the truth of the words that ' a couritil defended by free men enthusiastically devoted to the cause of their king and constitution caI' neyer be conquered.' Canada, too, had a towee of strengtli in Isaac Brock, a distinguisled British soldier, who had seen active service 10 the West Indies and in Holland, and had bee' with Nelson at Copenhagen. On juIy 11, 1812, General William 1111 commander of the American army of t08 north-west, invaded Canada and occupieô Sandwich, a small town almost directly opP\"' site Detroit. On the following day he -issle' a proclamation with the intent of dealfi Canadians from their allegiance. In this PfO clamation he protested against the empl0y' ment of Indians as combatants, althouglh tue persistent endeavours of the AmericaiS win the Indians over to their cause fl5 have been known to him. The words of tbe proclamation are as follows : If the barbarous and savage polic53t0",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG 91 Great Britain be pursued, and the savages let loose to murder our citizens, and butcher our women and children, this war Will be a war of extermination. The first S5troke of the tomahawk, the first attempt wjth the scalping-knife, will be the signal for one indiscriminate scene of desolation!1 No white man found fightiflg by the side Of an Indian will be taken prisoner; in- stant destruction will be his lot. this Brock replied : This inconsistent and unjustifiable threat 'Of refusing quarter, for such a cause as being found in arms with a brother suifferer In1 defence of invaded rights, must be excercised with the certain assurance of retaliation, not only in the limited opera- ti0fl of war in this part of the King's bo'ninions, but in every quarter of the globe. For the national character of Britain is not less distinguished for hUlTanity than strict retributive justice, Which will consider the execution of this irlhun-ian threat as deliberate murder, for W'ýhich every subject of the offending power rnust make expiation.",
         "93 TECUMSEH Tecumseh, with the aid of the Britie agents, had assembled six hundred warriol1 on Bois Blanc Island, and his scouts were s0 out watching the movements of the ener0y in the surrounding country. The only wayO0f communication open to the Americans W110 were advancing towards Detroit was a1O09 the west side of the Detroit river by a r086 which passed through Brownstown from tbe river Raisin. This road was kept under tbe strictest surveillance by the Indians. 00 August 5 the scouts reported that Major V90~ Horne, with two hundred cavalry of HuM\"o army, was on his way from Detroit to WeOt Captain Brush, who was near the Raisin W1te a company of Ohio volunteers, bringing ofc dispatches and provisions for Hull at SaO\"' wich. On receiving this news TecuniSc mustered seventy of his boldest warriors a't Brownstown and started through the wOdo towards Detroit to meet Van Horne. About three miles out he secreted his men on escb side of the road and awaited the eiieil Apparently Van Horne, little dreaming tbl\u0026, a trap would be set for him, had not se0\" out scouts; and as he marched down 0# road the quiet forest gave no indica-toD the foe lurking on his flanks, until TecuJ1SW",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG 93 ~fdhis band, suddenly springing from their 0'tnbuscade and sounding the war-whoop, leePed upon his horsemen. The terrified 4,Tericans thought the woods alive with 14dians. Officers tried in vain to rally their Inenp Who turned and sought safety in flight, While Tecumseh and his warriors followed in kursuit *A Parthian shot fromn one of the AX4ericans killed a young chief; this was 'ecuflsehls only loss. The enemy lost about 'hundreci in killed, wounded, and missing; 81,what was of the greatest import- ateta packet, containing officiai dispatches frjnHull to the secretary of War and other DOPers, was captured. This was Tecumseh's fltit engagement in the British cause. The Indian leader knew that the majority rj Iridians would incline towards the side Whieh was first victorious. When, therefore, th norgn news was now received that SArnerican fort on Mackinaw Island had Qe'Captured, Tecumseh sent runners in 611 directions ttelheIndians of his recent 'V'etOrY and of the fali of Fort Mackinaw. He tIOunced that British success was assured, ef adroitly added that, if they desired to the plunder, they must immediately jo1 the conquerors. One of these light-footed",
         "94 TECUMSEH messengers reached the famous chief of the Potawatomis, Shaubena, as he was about tO start on a hunting expedition. The runile distributed presents of bright-coloured bead0 and other ornaments among the women of the tribe, and to Shaubena he delivered a beit of wampum, with Tecumseh's message. e hunting expedition was abandoned, Shaubell with his warriors set out at once for Amherst' burg, and became Tecumseh's trusty aide' fighting henceforth by his side until the hOf of the great Shawnee's death. Meanwhile General Hull had corne to t08 conclusion that he could not maintain 0i position on the soul of Canada. On the nigOt of August 7 he withdrew bis troops fiM\"O Sandwich and crossed the river to Detroit, It was of the utmost importance, h6weVell that he should make a juncture with CaPtW' Brush and reopen his communications Wt the country beyond Lake Erie. To effect 00,~ object he sent out a force of six hundred 1e under Colonel James Miller, with cavalry artillery. At this time Tecumseh was gt Brownstown with about two hundred wariorot and Major Muir of the British Army, ini cOl mand of about one hundred and sixty regular$ and militia, was also stationed there. On' tbe",
         "UNDER TI-IF BRITISH FLAG 95 rnOOtning of August 9 some Indians emerged fro11 the forest and reported that the American troops under Miller were about eight miles dista t, and, on account of the difficulty of tran'tsporting the guns over the heavy roads, Were raking but slow progress. It was evident tha't t ey could not reacli Brownstown before Igtand Major Muir, after a hasty con- \"Utation with Tecumseh, decided to meet the ez1e1y at Maguaga, a small Indian village betllee Brownstown and Detroit. The In- in their scant habiliments of war, their bodies grotesquely painted in varied Col0Urs, strode silently by the side of the rljhsoldiers. The allies rapidly pushed Way along the muddy road, past the of the recent attack, where carcasses of and horses stili lay by the roadside. A hatwas called within a quarter of a mile fMaguaga, at a place favourable for an nj1bUscade, and preparations were made for h. tte. The British took up a position be- 'ý1cI a Slightly rising bit of ground. Tecumseh 1Psdhis men in a meadow, about six hut1dred 'Yards in extent, which bordered the Ndg along which the Americans were advanc- ti.The wild grass grew rank and high and '%f0rded sufficient concealment. The Indians",
         "96 TECUMSEH threw themselves down to await the ene0fl' and their example was followed by the Britis' Tecumseh and his men, peering froim thý( covert, soon distinguished the main IbodY 0 the enemy marching in two lines, slowlyan steadily. As they came withln range a sinl shot rang out-the signal for battie. Ired Indians fired one deadly volley, and, vwitb t00 blood-curdling crY that the Americans 110J Iearned to dread, burst wildly from their b11' ing-place. The enemy replied with a rcJ0 fire and, as Tecumseh and his men spr\u0026Og bravely forward, followed it up with a bayoget charge. The bright uniforms of the British now e vealed their position, and the action bechi0 general. Unknown to the regulars, bOôa of Indians had been posted at the extrefit of a neighbouring wood, and, being subjeC-td to a hot fire and unable to endure the of bullets, they endeavoured to gain the Bil rear. Appearing in this unexpected quad they were mistaken for the foe, and as týel emerged from the wood were fired upoil their comnrades - in - arms. The red niet' turn mijstook the British for Americaris 90 promptly returned the fire, and for sorne À disorder and confusion reigned. The 10lu",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG 97 reiOnsranesof the officers were lost in1 the lnand Confusion of battie. Hard pressed ~'n front and, as he imagined, attacked in the tear, Major Muir ordered a retreat; he then re- fOrtned his men on the crest of a hili to await the appearance of the enemy. This position COITtnanded a small bridge over which, the e41erican artillery would have to pass. Here, \"Ota quarter of a mile distant from their fori'tner position, the British waited for a qlntrof an hour, after which, as the enemy 41d t ot reappear, Muir again ordered a re- trcHis communication with Tecumseh 4d been broken, and, hearing sounds of fý1ng from the woods to his left, lie inferred that the Americans were driving the Indians '11tha.t direction with the object of reaching te rOa to cut him off from his boats. He 9q4ined the shore of the river, however, with- 04t iriterference from the enemy, found his oe intact, and pulled swiftly towards estburg. blecumnseh and his warriors had borne the tint of the battle and displayed magnifi- hrtCourage. After the firing of Muir's men 8e Ceased, they still fought stubbornly, in D'te Of the» vast numerical superiority of the 1ten and retreated slowly through the woods Ir.",
         "98 TECUMSEH in a westerly direction. Then, turning about, they succeeded in regaining their canoes, and followed in the walce of the British. Tlie Americans were unaware of the extent Of their success, and fearing a renewed attalC, they abandoned their march and retreated to Detroit. And it was not until several dayS after this lively encounter that they agaif0 attempted to reopen communications witb' their army to the South. Four uneventful days followed. The nigllt of the x3th was calm and cloudless. About Fort Malden sentries paced their cease' less round. Camp-fires glowed about the wigwams and blockhouses of Bois Blanc. Tecumseh lay in the open, surrounded bY! his sleeping warriors. Although it was past midnight, his sleepless eyes scanned the heavens. The moon cast a shimmering patIl upon the water, in whose depths myriads of stars were refiected. Even as Tecunle gazed a bright star sped like a golden arrO\"W across the sky. He marked its flight until it fell afar and seemed to cleave the dark depti19 of the river. What did this fiery messeflgef portend ? Again a youth, he threaded ' way through the gloomn of the f orest, seel'v",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG 99 Iflg the guiding spirit of bis manhood, until a brigh-t star fell across his path. Then, in vivid ZTemory, came the tortures of initiation. A Man, he journeyed in strange lands beneath a Scorching sun, or feit the biting winter blasts. Again his heart beat high with hope, only to be cast down by the crushing defeat of bis Plans. But stili, upborne by aimost super- bunian strength, urged by some strange, im- Pelling power, he must battie for bis race. T'he restless river, as it fretted the sides of the littie island placed so protectingly agairist the Canadian shore, sang of battie, whose OUtcome none might guess. Suddenly be was aroused from bis waking dream. by shouts of ]Oy and the booming of cannon from the decks Of the General Hunter, which lay at anchor itl the river. It was a salute in honour of the arrivai of General Brock. A vigorous 'cheer announced his appearance at Fort Malden. The Indians joiried in the welcome etnd fired off their muskets. A boat made isway towards the island, and the warriors erowded about it as Colonel Elliott stepped O8hore. He gave them officiai information Of Brock's arrivai, and warned the Indians tOSave their scanty ammunition. Notwith- 8tanding the Iateness of the hour, Tecumnseh",
         "'00 TECUMSEH with his attendant chiefs accompanied Elliott back to the f ort to meet the commander in1 whose hands he had placed the fate of his people. Arrived at Amherstburg, Elliott re- plied to the sentry's challenge, and theY entered the fort. On reaching the room lin which Brock sat, they found him deeply en- grossed in the contents of th-e captured nmail packets, which were strewn on the table before hlm, for these told him that General Hul had lost the confidence of his garrison at Detroit, and that dissensions had destroyed ail unity of purpose among the officers. The candlelight streamed on his red-brown hair and shone on the gold-fringed epaulets of his scarlet uniform. Elliott at once presented Tecumseh to Brock. The latter raised i$ eyes to behold 'the king of the woods,' whoSe very presence seemed to exhale the freedolri of the forest. One of the best pen-portraits extant Of Tecumseh is by Captain Glegg, who th\"$ describes him, upon this occasion of his pre' sentation to Brock: Tecumseh was very prepossessing, huS figure light and finely proportioned, 111- age I imagined to be about five-and-thirtYp",
         "SIR ISAAC BROCK From an engraving in theJlohn Ross Robertson Collection, Toronto Public Library",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG ioi his height five feet nine or ten inches, his complexion light copper, his countenance oval, with bright hazel eyes beaming cheerfulness, energy and decision. Three smrall crowris or coronets were suspended from the lower cartilage of his aquiline nose, and a large silver medallion of George the Third, which I believe his ancestor had received fromn Lord Dorchester when governor-general of Canada, was attached to a mixed coloured wampum string which hung round his neck. His dress consisted of a plain, neat uniform, a tanned deer-skin jacket with long trousers of the sanie material, the seanis of both being covered with neatly cut fringe, and he had on his feet leather moccasins much ornamnented with work made from the dyed quilîs of the porcupine. Tecumseh regarded Brock calmly, noting With admiration the athletic form, as it towered to its full height. Thus stood the two com- lnanding figures, both born to lead, alike bold ~in purpose and ready in resource. With the sanie intuitive perception each trusted the Other. They were akin-both of the' brother- hood that binds the brave of all the earth.'",
         "102 TECUMSEH The brown hand of Tecumseh met the strong white hand of Brock in a warrn clasp, the seal of a firmn friendship. Brock thanked Tecuniselh for his salute of welcome, and like Colonel Elliott rnentioned the shortage of ammunitiori. With warrn words of praise he referred to the work of the warriors in the recent engage- ments, comrnending Tecurnseh's IeadershiP and courage in the highest terms. The chief listened with characteristic calrn. Brock con'- tinued: 1 1 have fought against the enemies of our great father, the king beyond the great lake, and they have neyer seen my back. 1 arn corne here to fight his enemies on this side the great lake, and now desire with my soldiers% to take lessons from you and your warriors, that I may Iearn how to make war in these great forests.' After a pause Tecumnseh, turir' ing round to his attendant chiefs, stretched ott his hand and exclaimed, ' Ho-o-o-e ; this is man!1' Brock was particularly pleased with the contents of the mail taken at Brownstow1* In striking contrast to Hull's high-soundi1g proclamation, it revealed that general's real attitude of dejection. Communication fron' the rear had been cut off ; he feared starva- tion and despaired of being able to withstalld",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG 103 attack. The contents of these dispatches Prompted Brock to invade American territory Without delay. Rapidly lie unfolcled a daring Plan against Fort Detroit, but his officers shook their heads and strongly dissented. Not so Tecumseh, who, as Brock sketched his scheme, had listened with gleaming eye, and Who now enthusiastiCally supported it. The commander inquired as to the character of the country through which they must pass to reach Detroit. For answer the chief unrolled a piece of elm bark, which lie held flat with four stones; and, drawing his scalping-knife from its sheath, lie traced with its point the !Oads, ravines, groves, and streamns. Brock iritently followed the blade of Tecumseh, be- t'eath whose hand a fine military map rapidly took shape. Was ever before Indian scalping- knife put to so good a use!1 This unexpected skill surprised and delighted Brock. When the map was coxnpleted, clear in outline, in- telligent in detail, any misgivingS he may have lad vanished. In the face of ail opposi- tionl and dissent Broclc resolved to attempt the capture of Detroit. Thanking Tecumseh for lis invaluable aid and promising to address his followers at noon the next day, the com- MTander retired for a few lours of much-needed",
         "104 TECUMSEH rest. Accompanied by his chiefs, the Indiail leader made his way back over the water tO the littie island. It was now alrnost morn- ing, and as lie scanned the brighteriing sky he wondered within himself whether it heralded a hopeful dawn for his unhappy people. At noon of that day one thousand IndianS of various tribes assembled beneath the treeS about Fort Malden. After the customary opening ceremonies Brock addressed therri, telling them he had corne across the great sait lake (the Atlantic ocean), at the request of their great father, to help theni, and that witli their assistance he would drive the AmericaiS from Fort Detroit. His words were greeted with noisy approval. Tecumseh then replied that he was pleased that ' their father beyond the great sait lake had at last consented to let his warriors corne to the assistance of hiS red children, who lad neyer ceased to remaili steadfast in their friendship and were now ail ready to shed their last drop of biood in their great father's service.' Seeing Tecumiseh surrounded by lis warriorS, who, fiery and indornitable, but unstabie as water, were united by his leadership alorie, Brock reaiized the powerful personaiity of hi$ new and valuable ally. Here is an extract",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG i05 froin one of Brock's letters written soon after- Wards: Among the Indians whom 1 fourid at Amherstbourg and who arrived from differ- ent parts of the country there were some extraordinary characters. He who most attracted my attention was a Shawniee chief-brother of the Prophet, who for the last two years has carried on, contrary to our remonstrance, an active war with the United States. A more sagacious or a more gallant warrior does not, I believe, exist. He was the admiration of every one Who addressed him. Preparations were rapidly made for a move- lnent against Detroit, and on the morning of tenext day, August 15, the British and 1fldians marched towards Sandwich. Brock 8eIt Lieutenant-Colonel Macdonell and Cap- tQ4f Glegg to General Hull, under a flag of truce, demanding the surrender of Detroit. Aclroitly embodied in his dispatch were the 'Illowing words: 1 You must be aware that the numerous bodies of Indians who have e ttached themselves to my troops will be beYond my control the moment the contest t1TIMrences.1 Hull replied that he was pre-",
         "io6 TECUMSEH pared to meet any force at Brock's command; whereupon the British batteries at SandwiCh' opened fire, which continued until evenilg- Under cover of darkness Colonel Elliott an'd Tecumseh led six hundred Indian warriors tO the shore of the river on the night of the 15tlh where they silently launched their canoes and gained the American side, prepared to'protect the crossing of the main army in the rnorning' In the quiet early dawn 320 British regulars and 400 Canadian militia were in readine5 to embark; and, as sunrise coloured the skYt a motley fleet pushed off from the Canadiazl shore. The war vessel Queen Charlottean the batteries at Sandwich opened fire, wlie the wooded shores re-echoed to the savage yells of 6oo painted braves. Brock st oOd erect in the foremost boat, which steered towards Springwells, about four miles belOV1 Detroit, where Tecumseh awaited hîs landing' Scarcely had Brock stepped ashore whefl $ scout rushed up with the news that alag body of American troops, who had left the fort two days before for another attempt to reach the army at the Raisin, were approach' ing from the rear, and were now but a feg miles distant. The attack must, therefOfe, be made at once. The forces were rapidly",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG 107 torriied in two columns, an advance was Sounded, and the allies pressed forward to- Wards Fort Detroit. That formidable stronghold bristled with eannon, which could be trained on any part \"f the advancing army. Yet steadily forward Warched the British, while the Iridians shouted their wild war-cry, which doubtless struck terror to the heart of Hull. The gunners in Detroit stood at their posts with lighted fuses, blIt the British and Indians dauntlessly ad- ý,anced tili they could see the black, yawn- 111g mouths of the guns, whose thunder each 410ment they thought to hear. At some distance from th-e fort Brock and *recumseh ascended an elevated bit of ground tO reconnoitre. Scarcely had they done so Whien a messenger was seen speeding from the fOrt with a white flag. Colonel Macdonell and C-aPtain Glegg were sent to meet 1dm. The news they brought back was that Hull was erepared to surrender. The fire fromn the batteries at Sandwich and fromn the Queen Charlotte, with the bold advance of the British afld the Indian war-cry, had done their work. 'rhe commanders rode forward and took pos- ~Ssion of the fort. Hull's twenty-five hun- 'ed men became prisoners of war, and all the",
         "1o8 TECUMSEH armaments and stores, along with the terri- tory of Michigan, passed into the hands Of the British. The Stars and Stripes were Iowered, and the Union jack streamed OlUt upon the breeze. Tecumnseh was elated and amazed at thi5 bloodless victory *over the Long Knives. Shortly after the surrender of Detroit, he is reported to have said to Brock: I have heard much of your fame alô arn happy again to shake by the hand e brave brother warrior. The Americal8 endeavoured to give us a mean opinion Of British generals, but we have been wit' nesses of your valour. In crossing the river to attack the enemy, we observed yOt' frorn a distance standing the whole tile in an erect position, and when the boato reached the shore you were among tCe first who jumped on land. Your bold allô sudden movements alarrned the enenl4 and compelled them to surrender to le-5 than half their own force. Brock, realizing the value of Teczurnsell'O services, honoured him publicly. Removillg his silken sash, he fastened it about the chief' shoulders, presenting hirn at the sarne tÎ0fe",
         "UNDER THE BRITISH FLAG i09 Weith a pair of pistols. Stoic though Tecumseh leas, he could not conceal his pride and grati- îfication at Brock's gif t. Next day, however, lie appeared without the sash ; and when the British general sent to inquire the reason, lie explained that hie had given it to Round- hlead of the Wyandots, an older and more VWaliant chief than himself. In his general order from Detroit, August 17, Jarock wrote: The conduct of the Indians, joined to that of the gallant and brave chiefs of their respective tribes, has since the commence- mient of the war been marked with acts of true heroism, and in nothing can they testify more strongly their love to the king, their great father, than by following the dictates of honour and humanity by which they have been hitherto actuated. Two fortifications have already been captured fromn the enemy without a drop of blood being shed by the hands of Indians. The instant the enemy submnitted, his life be- came sacred. lhat such was the case at Detroit was almost etItirely due to the dominating influence of Tlecumseh over his followers.",
         "CHAPTER VIII FIGHTING ON AMERICAN SOIL AFTER Brock had accomplished his work at Detroit, he hastily returned to the seat O government at York to make preparatioll for guarding the Niagara frontier; and hefe we must take our leave of the great soldiec, for another writer in these Chronicles is to tell of his subsequent movements, anid of liO glorious death on Queenston H-eights. Coloniel Procter was left in command of the wester0' forts, to which Tecumseh was attached' Owing to an unfortunate armistice arrangeô between the belligerent nations, the energetic Indian chief could do nothing more than ece1 his powers in persuading many undecided warriors to becomne Britain's allies. In tli5 business he moved through the Indian country between Lake Michigan and the Wabash, daiWY increasing his forces. In the meantime General Harrison, of whOn' we learned something in a preceding chapteci",
         "FIGHTING ON AMERICAN SOIL i W',as given command of the north-western arm'ny of the Uriited States. He was invested WIith wide authority, and instructed, first of ill, to provide for the defence of the western frontiers and then to ' retake Detroit, with a \"iew to thie conquest of Canada.' The first ecart of these instructions he proceeded to eCarry out by raiding Indian villages and burnjng their cornfields. Next he arranged hi5 autumn campaign, which had in view the recapture of Detroit and, if possible, thie tCaPture of Fort Malden and the invasion of Canada. His troops occupied Fort Defiance, Onl the Maumee, as a base of supplies, and SEIndusky, on the south shore of Lake Erie, 8an observation post. Before much could be done, however, th-e autumn waned, and liarrison, with seventeen hundred men, en- Calnlped for the winter on the right bank of the Maumee, at the foot of the rapids, near the place where Wayne had fought the battîe of the Fallen Timbers sixteen years before. 11Jjanuary 1813 Major Reynolds, of the 11riti sh forces on the Detroit, niarched into Prenchtown with fifty soldiers and two hun- dlred Indians. Frenchtowfl stood on the site Of thie present city of Monroe (Mich.) on the",
         "112 TECUMSEH river Raisin, about midway between Detroit and Harrison's camp on the Maumee. 011 the z8th scouts reported the approach of a\"l American force of some five hundred anid fifty regulars and Kentucky volunteers. ReY' nolds made a judicious disposition of his mnetl to meet this superior force, but the enenY fell suddenly upon him, driving him bac1' about a mile. When the British had gairied the shelter of a wood their three-pounder di 6 effective work, causing the enemny considef' able loss, and a continuous fire from mijlititl and Indians held the Americans in check fOt a time. But the contest was hopeless, ail6 Reynolds retreated to Brownstown, abot eighteen miles distant, having lost one militig' man and three Indians, and having killed twelve Americans and wounded fifty-flve' The Anierican captain made no attempt to pursue the British, but established hirnself el Frenchtown, and two days later Genera'l Winchester marched in with a large body O American troops. During the night of the z8th word 0 Reynolds's repulse was brought to Proctet, who, with unaccustomed alacrity, hastefleô froin Amherstburg with ail his available forcet leaving but a few men to guard the fOtt",
         "FIGHTING ON AMERICAN SOIL Z13 Fýarly on the morriing of the 20t11 he led five hundred militia and regulars and eight 1hundred Indians across the frozen waters of the Detroit river. The troops were soon Winding their way along the road on the Western shore. At nightfall they encaniped ~In the open about five miles from the enemy, and lighted huge fires to protect themselves fromn the bitter winter cold. Before day- break of the 21St they were again on the march ,and sighted the American camp while ail was clarkness and silence. No outpost guarded the slumbering encampment, and the British nPProached unchallenged. They had brought tllree three-pounders with them, and these '%ere swiftly but silently placed in command- lflg positions. The line for attack was being formed when the musket-shot of a sentinel rang out through the crisp air, and was Inmiediately followed by the roar from a tIlree..pounder, which startled the sleeping Cflip into activity. Thus the British Iost 801ne of the advantage of a surprise attack. InStead of making a rapid advance and baYonet charge, or an attack upon the sur- lroufding parapet, from which the enemy Werought such havoc later, Procter ordered the three..pounders to be brought into action, and T. H",
         "1 14 TECUMSEH while this was being done, the Americans had seized their arms and prepared for a stubborri defence. Procter attacked with the regulars in the centre and the militia and Indians on the flanks. The American centre f ought fro1' behind defences, and their fire cause d great havoc in the ranks of the regulars, where the fire was hottest and the loss most severe. After the fight had continued for upwards of an hour, the Indians decided the issue. Out- flanking the enemy on each side, they gained the rear, and fiercely assailed and drove il' the enemny's right, which gave way and fled in terror to the farther side of the river Raisill, seeking shelter in the woods. The Indial5 followed across the ice in swift pursuit, eageî for slaughter. The blood-stained snow and the bodies of those overtaken marked the direction of their flight for almost two miles. Only a f ew prisoners were captured, but amoiig them were Colonel Lewis, General Winchester? and his son, a lad of sixteen years of age. So complete had been the surprise of the American camp that when Winchester WO~ led into the British lines he was clothed orIW in his night-shirt. The American Ieft and centre, howevelt",
         "FIGHTING ON AMERICAN SOIL 115 Still held out stubbornly, fighting desperately through fear of falling into the hands of the Indians and sharing a fate similar to that Of their comrades. On learning tliat the eonflict was stili ini progress, Winchester pencilled an order to the commanding officer tO surrender, in order to prevent further loss 0f life. The command was immediately obeyed, and the action ceased. A number If the Americans made good their escape to Harrison's camp on the Maumee, where eort Meigs was erected immediately after- Walrds. «'The zeal and courage of the Indian dlepartment were neyer more conspicuous than 'Il this occasion,' wrote Procter, 'and the Indcian warriors fought with great bravery.' Tecumnseh himself was not present at the ýattle of Frenchtown, as he was busy seek- 149n recruits among the Indian allies of the hritish The leader of the Indians on that Occsion was Roundhead of the Wyandots. Learning that Harrison had reorganized his army and brought up artillery and stores ~strengthen his position at Fort Meigs, PrOcter decided to attack the American ~eieral in force. Harrison, as we have seen, 4ad about 1700 men and expected an equal reinforcemnent under General Green Clay.",
         "Procter, now a brigadier-general, embarked at Amherstburg with iooo white troops and ail available artillery. Tecumseh, who bad returned to headquarters, led his Iridians over( land. The resuit of his mission among the tribes now manif ested itself. As he advanced, his force was greatly augmented, manir warriors joining him at the mouth of thle Maumee, until at last he commanded not fewer than 1200 men. The British forces reached the vicinity of Fort Meigs on April 28, and went into camp opposite the fort; but heavY rains delayed operations until the ist of May- Procter erected a battery a short distance above his camp; another battery was so011 added: but the fire from both proving ini' effective, a third was established across the river just below Fort Meigs. The expected American reinforcements reached the head of the rapids, and on the night of May 4 a messenger from Harrison1 made his way through the British Uines tO Clay, înstructing himn to land eight hundred men on the left bank of the Maumee to carrJr the British batteries there, and spike the guris, afterwards crossing to, the fort. The rem mainder of the troops were to land on the right side of the river and make their way through' Y. 16 TECUMSEH",
         "FIGHTING ON AMERICAN SOIL 117 thle Indians to the fort. According to orders, Colonel Dudley landed with the specified force, rushed the batteries, which were manned Only by a few gunners, and spiked the guns. The main body of British were at the camp a mile and a half distant. But, contrary to orders, Dudley did not return immediately to bis boats and cross to the fort ; instead, he left the greater part of his men at the batteries Uinder Major Shelby and set off with the rest in Pursuit of some Indians. The routed artillerymen, reaching the 13ritish camp, made known the loss of guns, and Tecumseh led his warriors to retake them through a downpour of rain. Dudley and the 3flialler body that accompanied him were drawn into an axnbuscade and annihilated, D~udley himself falling beneath the toma- hawk; while the larger force left in possession Of the captured batteries was assailed by Major Muir, with fewer than two hundred men, and Put to rout. The ArnericanS fled for refuge tO the woods, only to be confronted there by the Indians. Thus caught between two fires, they were utterly destroYed. Clay's force Of 450 men had landed on the OPPosite side of the river, where they were nttacked by the Indians. But they were soon",
         "118 TECUMSEH reinf orced by a detachment sent from the fort to meet them, whereupon they turned upoil the British position, captured one gun, and took prisoner forty of the 41Ist regiment. The remainder of the British at this point strengthened by a small detachment of militia and Indians, advanced and retook the battery, and the Americans were driven back into the fort. A white flag now fluttered from the walls of Fort Meigs. Harrison proposed an ex- change of prisoners, in the hope that during the delay caused by these proceedings lie would be able to get rnuch-needed baggaget stores, and animunition into the fort. But the boats containing his supplies were cap- tured by the Indians, who took childislh pleasure in their rich plunder. When the prisoners had been exchanged Harrison agaili opened fire, and the contest continued until the 9th with littie resuit. Unaccustomed to this prolonged warf are and weary of fighting, the greater part of the Indians now returned to their villages tO celebrate their recent victory; but Tecumseht although his force, so laboriously brought to- gether, had dwindled to fewer than twent5Y warriors, remained with the British. Thie",
         "FIGHTING ON AMERICAN SOIL zig Inilitia also grew restless and discontented, end desired to return to their homes, to attend tO the spring seeding of their fields. Under these conditions Procter was obliged to abandon the siege of Fort Meigs and withdraw his forces. During this affair an event occurred which illustrates the marvellous power of Tecumseh's Personality. While some of the American Prisoners were being conducted to the boats, theY were savagely attacked by a band of Strange Indiens. These warriors, who had taken no part in the engagement, greatly out- IlUmbered the guard. Forty of the prisoners had already been put to death before a 'lessenger set off at full speed to Tecumseh With news of this horrible outrage. The Idian leader rode rapidly towards the scene 'If the massacre, which was then at its height. Throwing himself fromn his horse, he grasped the two nearest savages and hurled themn l'ioIently to the ground. Brandishiflg his tomnahawk, he rushed amnong the Indians, and itl a voice of thunder forbade them to touch atiother prisoner. The massacre ceased in- 8tantly, and, awed by Tecumseh'5 presence 411d threatening mannrief the savages dis- ePpeared into the woods. Towards the latter part of juIy Tecumseh",
         "120 TECUMSEH persuaded Procter to make another attemlpt to, take Fort Meigs. After much delibera- tion the British general finally started up theC Maumee with a force of four hundred white soldiers and about three hundred IndialU. He took with him also several six-pounderS. The troops disembarked on the right banIk not far from the fort. Tecumseh, fertile il strategy, had devised a plan by which he hoped to lure the garrison from the fort. His scouts had apprised himn that Harrison with a large force was at Sandusky, about sixty mniles distant. The chief proposed that the IndialS should gain the road which led from SanduscY to Fort Meigs and that a shamn battle should be enacted there to deceive the garrisolt who would naturally suppose that some -O Harrison's force, coming to the fort, were being attacked. They would hasten to the assistance of their comrades, and the British would fali upon them in the rear, while \u0026 strong force assailed the fort. The plan met with Procter's approval, and the IndialS proceeded to carry it out. Heavy firing waO soon heard, and it became so, animated that even some of Procter's men believed that a re0i engagement was in progress. But the garrisOO made no response, and the mock battie, whiCb'",
         "FIGHTING ON AMERICAN SOIL 121 lasted about an hour, was finally terminated bY a heavy downpour of rain. i Tecumseh's plan for the capture of Fort eeigs had miscarried, but he stili hoped for ~1CtorY. He induced Procter to make an ýttack upon Fort Stephenson (now Fremont 111 the state of Ohio), about ten miles from the nIOUth of the Sandusky river. On July 28 the British troops embarked with artillery \u0026nd Stores and entered Sandusky Bay. Most Of the Indians marched through the woods between the Sandusky and the Mauniee. On AýUgust: 1 Procter, having ascended the river, q 1ernanded the surrender of Fort Stephenson fromn Major Croghan, the officer in command. Ie garrison consisted of only one hundred etrd sixty men, and they had but one gun; yet Croghan refused to surrender. Procter then 1Inded his men and opened fire on the north- est angle of the fort ; but his guns were light, end the cannonade, which continued for thirty hours, had but littie effect. Port Stephenson was bujît on the edge of Sdeep ravine filled with brushwood. Before the main building was a ditch, the sides of %*hich were crowned with palisades. About t'Ur o'clock in the afternoon Procter ordered ~\"assault. He divided his mien into two",
         "parties, one to attack the fort fromn the north' west, the other to assail the southern side. Armed with axes, which, however, were S0 blunt as to be almost useless, the men of the first party broke through the outer palisades and gained the ditch. Here they foufld further advance impossible, as they had \"10 scaling-ladders. In this position they were raked by a deadly fire of nxusketry from th'e fort. The men at the southern side were O so severely pressed ; but after two hours' hard fighting the British were forced to withdrawt having suffered a loss of about one hundred killed and wounded. Under cover of dari\u003c' ness Procter and his men regained their boat5 and returned to Amherstburg. Greatly diO' heartened at these repeated failures, Tecumnseh and his warriors marehed overland to tile head of Lake Erie and again went into canIW on Bois Blanc Island. TECUMSEH 122",
         "CHAPTER IX THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE 1'Ehope of the British now centred in their Z.eet, which comnianded Lake Erie. It was tonthat Harrison was anxious to regain tktroit and invade Canada, but he could do Ilothing until the control of the lake had been 'O*Towards this object the Aniericans flow bent their energies, sparing no expense in their effort to equip a lake fleet superior to that of the British. Several new ships were building ~1l the port of Presqu'isle (now Erie), Pennsyl- plizay under the direction of Captain Oliver Ierry, the young officer in command on Lake ti.At length nine American vesselS were ftted out-Lawrence, twenty guns; Niagara, tWentY guns; Caledonia, three guns; Ariel, 01rguns ; Scorpion, two guns; Somers, two iuls Trpe one gun; Porcupifle, one gun; 7'gesone gun. These boats were com- '11andeà by able officers and were manned 'ýhief1y by experienced seamnen taken from 123",
         "the crews of frigates which were blockaded in the seaports. Opposed to this fleet Canada had on LaJ*e Erie a squadron consisting of six vessels' Queen Charlotte, seventeen guns; Lady Pre' vost, thirteen guns; Hunter, ten guns; Little Beit, three guns ; Chippewa, one gun ; Detroi stili on the stocks at Amherstburg, nineteeil guns. Captain Robert Barclay, one of NeJ' son's heroes at Trafalgar, was in commarid' Like the great admirai under whom he served, he had lost an arm. in naval conflict, which gained for him the Indian titie of ' our fatlee with the one arm.' The Amnerican ships had been in readirles since the early part of July, but were bloce' aded in Presqu'isle. There were but seveO feet of water on the bar at the entrance to the harbour, which made it impossible fot the larger ships to sail out with their he3'%Y armnament on board and in face of a fire frOO1 the British ships. Barclay, assured of Wý9 inastery of the situation, frequently visie places along the coast in search of provisiOfle The enemy, who maintained constant aO d careful watch, took advantage of his absenIce on one of these occasions and skilfully sliPPed their vessels over the bar. Barclay, on te TECUMSEH 124",
         "THE BATTLi, OF LAKI BRIL 13ARCLAY'S ILAGSIF, T1HE 1mIRO/f (,) PERRY'S FLAG~SHIFî, TIII, NIAGA4RX (j) THE P'ASSAGE FROM TH111 LIIWR-RNVCL TO TH 11h NLI\u0026UR \u003emPriflts in the Jolin Ross Robertsoni Collection, Toronto Public Library",
         "THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE 125 turning, saw with dismay that the American, iieet had escaped from Presqu'iSIe, and, realizjng that the control of the lake had Passed from, his hands, he directed his course tOwards Amherstburg to hasten the coin- eletion of the Detroit. Starvation threateried the garrison at Amn- herstburg. Indians swarmed about the fort, their numbers seeming to increase as the food 81'Pply diminished. Barclay writes, 'There flS ot a day's flour in the store and the 'quladron was on haif allowance of many thirigsi' and ' it was necessary to fight the elleniY to enable us to get supplies of every dlescription.' Immediate battie was inevit- eble, and on the efforts of the navy hung a nlOrnentous issue. Should it fail, supplies fOZT1 Niagara would be cut off and Harrisofl's forces which were stationed in readiriesS for h13 ,opportunity, would march in and crush rcter's command. lFromn Bois Blanc Island Tecumseh and his WaIrriors followed with interest the manoeuvres O\u003ef the American ships. They watched with WOtlder the spreading sails, which in the rnorning sun looked like a flock of huge white 4'lagulls. Naval warf are was neW to many Of the Indians, and they gazed in sulent awe",
         "'26 TECUMSEH as the ships saiIed towards Arnherstburg, Tecumseh, who closeIy followed their imove' ments, assured the Indians crowded about hiln on the beach that these vesseis with their proud white sals would soon be destroyed by ' their father with the one arm.' 1t there were no signs of immediate battie, aiid Tecumseh grew impatient. Launching lis canoe, he paddled over to Amherstburg 1t' discover the reason of delay. ' A few daYs since you were boasting that you comnianded the waters; why do you flot go out and mieet the Americans ?' he demanded of Procter- ' See, yonder they are waiting for you arIa daring you to nieet them.' Procter assured Tecumseh that the delay would not be long; the British were waiting for the completion Of thue Detroit. The chief returned to the isiarid to inform his warriors that the big canoes O their great fathers were not yet ready arid that the destruction of the American fleet must be delayed a few days. Barclay remained in Amherstburg to haste\" the completion of the Detroit, his Iargest vessel. But, at Iength, as further delay Wa5 dangerous, she had to be Iaunched as she wa5f in a rough and imperfect condition. In de' fault of other guns, she was armed with 1011g 126",
         "THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE. 127 4tfrt.g pieces taken from the ramparts of the ort.Every calibre of gun- was used, and 8incomplete was her equiprneflt that her Can411 had to be discharged by flashing * 'St0is at the touch-holes. Long and vainly had Barclay waited for the \"errival of the promised seamen frorn Lake 0rtario, with whom he hoped to man his ships. k8insistent appeal and final remolistrance W*ere treated with indifference. There were *btflfty experienced seamen in the British 'Ptthe remainder of the crews consistiiig ~two hundred and forty soldiers and eighty Canladtian volunteer sailors, who had no0 DriOPer training in seamanship and gunnery. While Barclay was obliged to enter the con- test With his fleet thus wretchedly equipped, P'errY had a force of over five hundi-ed men, 4ardY frontiersmen and experienced soldiers, \"'a sufficiency of trained seamen to work 4'8 Squadron in any weather or circUltiStance. rJ1the night of September 9 the British comi- 41,Ier ran up his flag, weighed anchor, and ýt sail, hoping to encounter early next morfl- \"l the American fleet, which lay thirty or \",ore Miles distant at Put-in-Bay. fThe grey curtain of rnorning mist rolled up O Lake Erie, where the British fleet stood",
         "out in battie array. A Iight breeze rippled the surface of the lake and filled the swellifl9 sails. Barclay took advantage of the favole able wind and bore towards the ArnericaO vessels, which were lying arnong a cluster f islands. He put forth every effort to reach thern before they could sal clear of the isiafld' to forrn their line. But the wind wa 50 ligbt that they had got away frorn their cran\"peô quarters before Barclay could corne near theffi The enemy's fleet now bore towards the British, Perry leading in bis flagship tOe Lawrence. From his rnast-head flew a flIag with the motto, ' Don't give up the ship ,..-0.te dying words of Captain James Lawrenice O the Chesapeakce, after whom the vesse1 W05 named. The British fleet, compactly forned and under easy sal, awaited the ener1Y'5 approach. Captain Barclay in bis flagsçl\"P Detroit headed towards the south-west. 'rbje Chippewa, Hunter, Queen Charlotte, LadY Prevost, and \"Little Beit, in close colurnn, fl lowed in bis wake. The breeze, stili ligh 1 veered to the north-east, giving the Americalls the weather gauge. About noon the action began. The 0r1f of the Detroit's twenty-four pounder, reVee' berating over the lake, told the anxiOUSl 128 TECUMSEH",
         "CAPTAIN RO3ERT BARCLAY ('OUR FATHER WITH THE ONE ARM') From the John Ross Robertson Collection, Toronto Public Library",
         "THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE 129 Watchers on land that the battie had begun. The first shot fell short, but the second struck the decks of the Lawrence, dealing death and destruction. Perry's Scorpion now opened fire with ber long thirty-two, and the Lawrence With her long twelves and her carronades. A8s son as the two flagships were engaged, the battie was taken up by the Scorpion, A4riel, and Caledonia opposed to the Chippewa, Queen Charlotte, and Hunter. For over two hours Barclay engaged Perry, Ufltjl brace and bowline of the Lawrence had been shot away. The American flagship's bull was rent by shot and sheil and every gun on her fighting side dismounted.- The condition of the Detroit was equally perlous. M1asts; and rigging were cut to pieces and her lecks torn and splintered fromn the heav3r fire Of the Lawrence. Captain Barclay's remain- iflg arm had been disabled in the early part Of the action, and, weak fromn his wounds, he haId been carried below. But the valiant Crew, inspired by the courage and determina- t'ofl of their officers, stubborly contintied the fight. Perry's ship being reduced to a wreck, that ealant yoting commander, still undaunted, rJeermnedtoabandon ber. Hauling down",
         "130 TECUMSEH his flag, he bade f our stout seamen row bulli to the Niagara. The littie boat sped swiftlY on her way ; ail about her the water waS churned to f oam by shot and shell. Those on the flagsbip anxiously watched the danger- ous passage, and broke into cheers as theit commander reached the Nia gara's deck ini safety and ran up his flag on that ship. The Lawrence now struck to the Detroit, but the latter's smail boats had been so damaged bY the enemy's fire that they were not seaworthY. The British, therefore, were unable to take possession of their prize before the actiofl recornmenced. A fresh breeze sprang up, and the fortunes of the fight changed. The Americans stili had the advantage of the wind, for Perry was able to choose both position and distance, whiIe Barclay's ships became unnianageable for lack of proper seamen. The American fleet was now drawn up in line. The Niagara bore up to pierce the British line. Passing betweefl the Lady Prevost, Little Beit, and Chippewa 011 the port side and the Detroit, Queen Charlotte, and Hunter upon the starboard, she flred heavy broadsides both ways. The Detroit, anticipating the manoeuvre, attempted tO wear, but in so doing ran foui of the Queefl 130",
         "THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE 131 Charlotte. In this helpless condition the two British ships remnained for some time. Perry, Promptly availing himself of this accident, bore down upon the distressed vessels, pour- irlg in broadside after broadside with deadly effect. The Detroit had already received rougi' treatment in combat witli the Lawrence; and the smaller vessels now also made her a target, the Somers, Porcupine, Tigress, and Caledonia, which had closed up in the rear, Ic eeping up a deadly fire asterfl. Neyer in any naval action was the loss greater in proportion to the number of men engaged. The encounter had been so severe that every officer on the Detroit was either killed or wounded. Barclay's thigh was badly Shattered and he had also been severely Wo1unded in the shoulder. So deadly had been the fire from the Amnerican guns that three..fourths of his men were disabled. With- olit officers to direct or men to fight, resistance Was no longer possible. All that perseverance ilnd courage could do had been done. The brave Barclay was compelled to yield at hast ta superior force and to double the weight of rTetal. The two ships so helplessly entangled Were the flrst to strike their colours, and their teample was followed by the Ilunter and Lady",
         "132 TECUMSEH Prevost. The Little Beit and the Chippewa endeavoured to, escape, and led the TripPO and Scorpion a lively chase before they were eventually captured. Cooper in his naval history remarks: Stress was laid at the time on the fact that a portion of the British, crews were Provincials, but the history of this col\" tinent is filled with instances which weflt to increase the renown of the mothet country without obtaining any credit for it. The hardy frontier men of the Amnerf can lakes are as able to, endure fatiguey as ready to engage and as constant i battie as the seamen of any marine I the world. They mereîy require good leaders, and this the English appear tO have possessed in Captain Barclay and lus assistants. It was three o'clock in the afternoon whel0 the flag of the Detroit was lowered, and CaP' tain Barclay with his officers, amidst the dead and dying who cumbered her decks, ga'Ve up their swords to Perry on the Nia gara.i The American commander could not but feel the greatest admiration for his courageoUls opponent. Courteous as he was brave, Pei 132",
         "THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE 133 begged the British officers to retain their Swords. For three hours the cannon had thundered Over Lake Erie on that fateful day, but, after the Opening encouniter, the manoeuvres of the 8hips were lost to those on shore in the heavy Clouds of smoke that hung over the water. When these had cleared away, a scene was revealed that contrasted sadly with that dis- CIosed by the lifting of the morning mist. Crippled and dismantled, the brave ships, Whose sails had swelled so proudly in the niorning breeze, now made their way towards eut-1*n-Bay. The Indians, marvelling at the roar of the Rufl5, watched intently the heavy smoke of battie drifting over the lake. When the thunder had ceased and the sky was clear they eagerly inquired as to the resut of the fight; and Tecunmseh demanded the reason for the vessels sailing ini the direction of the AXrierican shore. Procter, fearing that the t1ews of defeat might cause the chief and his Warriors to desert, craftily explained that his leessels had beaten the Americans, but had torie to refit and would return in a few days. YaUt Tecumnseh's keen eyes soori detected signs Oii land which aroused his suspicions, for hasty",
         "preparations were being made for retreat. He was indignant at what seemed to him the cowardice of Procter, and demanded to be heard in the name of ail bis warriors. At a council of war held on September 18 the great orator delivered his last powerful speech- With flashing eye and rapid gesture he thuV' dered forth to Procter: Father, listen to your children!1 VoUl have them now ail before you. The war before this, our British fathef gave the hatchet to bis red children, whe0, our old chiefs were alive. Tbey are now dead. In that war our father was throWIl on bis back by the Americans ; and out father took themn by the hand without 'ouf knowledge ; and we are afraid our father will do so again at this time. Summer before last, when I came for- ward with my red brethren and was read5Y to take up the hatchet in faveur of out British father, we were then told net to be in a hurry-that he had not yet determinecl to fight the Americans. Listen 1 When war was declared OUf father stood up and gave us the tomahawk? and told us that he was then ready to strilc TECUMSEH 134",
         "THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE 135 the Americans ; that he wanted our assist- ance, and that he certainly would get us back our lands, which the Americans had taken from us. Listen!1 You told us at that time to bring forward our families to this place, and we did so, and you promised to takre care of them and that they should want for nothing, while the m'en would go and fight the enemy; that we need not trouble our- selves about the enemy's garrisons ; that we knew nothing about them and that Our father would attend to that part of the business. You also told your red chilren that you wo'uld take good care of your garrison here, which made our hearts glad. Listen!1 When you were last at the Rapids, it is true we gave you littie assist- ance. It is hard to fight people who live like ground hogs. Father, listen!1 Our fleet has gone out; we know they have fought ; we have heard the great guns ; but we know nothing of what has happened to'1 our father with the one arm.' Our ships have gone one way, and we are niuch astonished to see our father tying up everything and preparing",
         "136 TECUMSEH to run away the other, without letting hi$ red children know what his intentions are. You always told us to remain here and take care of your lands ; it made our hearts glad to hear that was your wish. Out great father, the king, is the head, and you represent him. You always told us yoil would neyer draw your foot off British ground ; but now, father, we see that you are drawing back, and we are sorry tO see our father doing so, without seeing the enemy. We must compare our father's conduct to a fat dog that carnies its tail on its back, but when affrighted drops it between its legs and runs off. Father, listen!1 The Americans have not yet defeated us by land, neither arc we sure they have done s0 by water; wve, therefore, wish ta remain here and fight 0Uir enemy should they make their appearance. If they defeat us, we will then retreat withl our father. At the battie of the Rapids, last watt the Americans certainly defeated us; and when we returned to our father's fort at that place, the gates were shut against us. We were afraid it would again be the case, but instead of closing the gates we n' 136",
         "THE BATTLE 0F LAKE ERIE 137 see our British father preparing to march out of his garrison. Father, you have the arms and ammuni- tion which our great father sent for his ted children. If you intend to retreat, give them to us, and you may go, and wel- corne, for us. Our lives are in the hands of the Great Spirit. We are determined to defend our lands, and if it be His will, we wish to leave our bones upon them. This challenging, sti-aightfotward, and heroic 8peech failed to move Procter. He stub- bornly refused to make a stand at Amherst- buirg, which, indeed, would have been fatal. 'recumnseh, however, accused him of cowardice, COntrasting his conduct with that of the courageous Barclay, and expressed his own ne~ed determination to remain and meet the tnerny.",
         "CHAPTER X TECUMSEH'S LAST FIGHT TEcuMSEH feit that the great purpose of lus life was about to fail. He had been champiOl not only of the rights of the Indians, but O their very existence as a nation. Dear tO his heart was the freedom of his people, anad to achieve this had been his sole ambition- Ail the powers with which he had been en' dowed-his superb physical strength, his keefl intellect, his powerful oratory-had been used to this one end. But now the cause for whiCbi he had fought so heroically in the face O frequent disaster seemed about to be ovet' thrown by Procter's weakness and irresolUl' tion. Tecumnseh was born to command, andô his proud spirit, naturally intolerant of col\" trol, chafed at following the dictates of e leader who had deceived him. The Indial5 had lost faith in Procter. There were dailY desertions, and Tecumnseh bitterly meditateô following the example of other chiefs. 1tt 138",
         "TECUMSEH'S LAST FIGHT 9 hli8 courageous spirit revolted at the thought Of retreat : to fiy before the enemy without 8triking a blow seemed to him the action not Of warrjors but of cowards. Procter pointed out that the fort, which had been dismantled to equip the Detroit, llas open to attack from, the river ; that the hOspitai was filled with sick soldiers; and that starvation stared the British in the face. 13ut the argument which weighed most with Tecumseh was that they would be able to, find along the river Thames a place much better suited for battie. And at last the Itidian leader reconciled his mind to the thought of retreat. The troops were soon busily engaged in 10ading the baggage. Part was stowed in boats to be sent inland by way of the Detroit river, Lake St Clair, and the Thames; the leImfainder was placed in heavy wagons to be tiaken overland. The women and children, arnong whomn were the general's wife and his 8ick daughter, were sent on ahead, the Squaws trudging along bearing their papooses OtI their backs. The troops set fire to the ShiPyards, fortifications, and public buildings 011 September 24, and marched out leaving Amlherstburg a mass of flames. Tecumseh 139",
         "140 TECUMSEH seemed sad and oppressed ; and as he gazed at the rolling clouds of smoke he said to Blile Jacket : ' We are now going to follow theC British, and I feel well assured we shall nevet return.' Procter halted at Sandwich, where he WO- joined by the garrison of Detroit, now aISO abandoned by the British, its fortificationls and public buildings having been destroyed. On the morning of the 27th the coîumn moved out of Sandwich. The lumbering wago1sy encumbered with much heavy and unneces, sary baggage, made slow progress. Procter's energy had vanished, and he displayed nonie of the forethought that a commander should have in the performance of bis duty. 14Je took no precaution to guard the supplY' boats ; bis men were indifferently fed, and 110 care was taken for their safety. Even the bridges, which should have been cut down tO hamper the progress of the enemny in pursuity were left standing. Three days after Procter's flight fr00f Amherstburg Harrison landed below the toW1 from Perry's vessels an arniy about five thotl sand strong. Finding Fort Malden a smoking ruin, and no enemy there, he pressed on tO Sandwich, with bis bands playing YanIcde 140",
         "TECUMSEH'S LAST FIGHT 4 -Doodle, and encamped. Two days later he was joined by Colonel Johnson with fifteen 1hUndred cavalry, and on the same day (September 29) a flotilla under Perry sailed \"P the river and stood off Detroit. After ta.ldng possession of Detroit, Harrison re- SOlved to hasten in pursuit of the British. Onl October 2 he left Sandwich with four thousand men, sending his baggage by water Uflder the protection of three gunboats which eerry had provided. Thus unencumbered, Ilis troops marched rapidly. On the morning Of the 3rd they overtook and captured a small eavalry picket of the British; and keepinig In motion throughout the day, they encamped that night not far below the place known as IýOIsen's, on the south side of the Thanies river, about six miles below Chatham. The main body of the British had left tà0isen's just a day in advance of the enemy, hlaving travelled only forty-five miles in five eaYs. Ail along the route Tecumseh had Persistentîy urged that a stand should be nlade. Procter had promised that this should 'le done, first at one place, then at another; ,,,tgeach time he had made some excuse. At ent\u003ewhen they came to the site of the 1~eent city of Chatham, where M'Gregor's 141",
         "142 TECUMSEH Creek falls into the Thames, Tecumseh pointed out to Procter the natural advantages of the ground and appealed to him to prepare 0 battie. The general approved of making a stand at this point, and declared that the British would either defeat Harrison here Or leave their bones on the field of conflict. Aft'er the leaders had completed their survey of tle proposed battle-ground, Tecumseh gazed mnus ingly at the swiftly flowing waters. 1 When 1 look at those two strean-s,' he said, 1 theY remind me of the Wabash and the Tippecanoe.' A gentier light shone in the warrior's eyes ; i thoughts were far away among the scenes O his Indian village-the village that he had hoped to make the centre of a great cO!1 federacy of red men. Meanwhile the main body of the Britisll troops were at Dolsen's, where they iiad arrived on the ist of October. Leaving bis troops at their camp, and Tecumseh and bis Indians at Chatham, Procter set out with a guard to escort his wife and daughter tO Moraviantown, a village of the Delaware Indians, twenty odd miles farther up the river. He was stili absent on October 3P when scouts returned with news of the capture of the cavalry picket. Procter bad",
         "TECUMSEH'S LAST FIGHT 143 Ietno orders ; and Warburton, the officer itl command, was at a loss what action to italce. After consulting with Tecumseh, who had corne down from Chatham, he ordered a retreat for two miles up the river ; there the troops formed up, fully expecting attack. But as the enemy failed to appear, they pro- Ceeded to Chatham. Tecumseh desired the troops to hait and encamp with his Indians Or' the opposite side of the river. Warburton, however, desired to continue the retreat. But Trecumseh would not yield, and Warburton Ordered his men across the stream, where the 1 nttire force camped for the night. Next rtiorning, before the troops had breakfasted, 8CODuts rushed into the camp bringing word of t he rapid advance of the enerny. Immedi- etely Warburton ordered his men to march, 'lot allowing them time even to take food. ýbout six miles up from Chatham Procter i Jined the army and took commarnd. The retreat continued until nightfall, when the t\"osencamped about five miles below Moraviantown, on the north bank of the Trharnes, where the village of Thamesville now %tands. But Tecunmseh and his band had not eCOmPanied the retreating party; and when",
         "144 TECUMSEH Harrison reached M'Gregor's Creek at Cha\u003e ham, he found his progress checked. The bridge there had been destroyed, and TecUfl' seh with his warriors disputed the passage- Harrison, thinking he was opposed by the whole British force, marshalled his army aiid brought up his artillery. After a slight skir' mish, in which Tecumseh was wounded in the arm, the Indians were forced to fali back. Jý second bridge was siniilarly contested, with a like resuit. Then Tecumseh and his Indiaffi retreated and joined ?rocter's forces neaf Moraviantown, while the Americans pushed eagerly forward. Drifting down-stream wete seen several British boats, which had beexi deserted by their occupants and set on fire. The morning of the 5th found Harrison nee Arnold's Milis, where he overtook and caP tured two gunboats and some bateaux ladell with supplies and ammunition. A few of the occupants escaped and fled overland towacô9 the British camp. Harrison's men the\" crossed the Thames, some of themn in boat5 and canoes and others on horseback. 13Y noon the entire American army had reacheô the opposite shore, where, farther up h British were bivouacked, only a short rnaf ch distant.",
         "TECUMSEH'S LAST FIGHT 145 On the morning of the same day, while the SOldiers were waiting for their rations to be ITleted out, the fugitives froni Arnold's Milis arrived at Procter's camp and inforrned him of the capture of the gunboats and of Harri- onsnear approach. Tecumseh was sitting on a moss-covered log, smoking and discussing the situation with Shaubena and a few of his Chief warriors, when a messenger summoned the Indian leader to the general's head- Suarters. He returned after a short absence, With clouded brow and thoughtful mien, and 8ilently resumed his pipe. One of the chiefs finalîy asked, ' Father, what are we to doP Shiall we fight the Americans ?' «Yes, my 8On,' slowly replied Tecumseh. 'We wilI be 1their smoke before sunset.' The dark shadow of his fate stole across Tecumnseh's consciousness. He had the same 8trange presentiment of death as his brother ýheeseekau, but he entered upon his last battie Just as fearlessly. ' Brother warriors,' he 8aid to those about him, ' we are now about tenter into an engagement from which 1 ShaIî neyer corne out. My body will remain 14Pon the field of battie.' His followers gazed 'It their leader in superstitious awe, as if they \"\"ere Iistening to a prediction that must in-",
         "evitably be fulfilled. He removed his sword, an d presented it to the Potawatomi chief Shaubena, saying, 'When my son becomnesa noted warrior, give him this.' Again the troops, tired and hungry, were ordered to march without being permitted to eat their morning mneal. They now nui- bered less than four hundred, without count- ing the Indians. Many were sick; ail wefe worn out with marching and much disheart- ened. Retreat has a depressing effect upol' the best of soldiers, but in this instance the troops, in addition, had lost faith in theif leader and entertained only slight hope Of victory. The boats that carried their affi' munition had been taken-ail they had lef t was what their pouches contained. Five O their cannon were at a ford behind Mora' viantown, and the one remaining gun-a si%' pounder-was useless for lack of ammunitioll The British took up their position aboUIt two miles below the village of MoraviantowIle across the travelled road which lay along the Thames some two hundred yards fromn jts banks. Their left flank was protected by3 the river and their right by a cedar swanIP By about one o'clock the troops were drawO up in order of battie between the swamp aild 146 TECUMSEH",
         "TECUMSEH'S LAST FIGHT 147 the river. A double line was formed extend- iflg across the road into the heart of a beech Wood, the second line about two hundred Yards to the rear of the first. The six-pounder 'Inounted guard on the road, threatening, but Useless. Procter, on a fleet charger and Surrounded by bis staff, had taken up his Position far back on the road, as if prepared for fligbt. Tecumseh had sagaciousiy disposed bis thousand warriors bebind the swamp on the right of the British uines; and, when ail was Ii readiness, the Indian leader visited Procter Rnd, expressing bis approval of the arrange- nient of the forces, passed down the British line. Ail eyes followed admiringly the familiar f1gure in its tanned buckskin. In bis beit Was his silver-mounted tomahawk, and bis lnlife in its leathern case. About his head a h1anadkerchief was rolied like a turban, and 8urnnounted by a white feather. He addressed each officer in Shawnee, accon-panying his Speech with expressive gestures. Whatever dlOubts were in his niind, hie maintained the clignity of a warrior to the end, and en- Cleavoured to instil courage into the hearts Of those about him. ' Father, have a big heart,l were bis last words to Procter. He",
         "then joined his warriors and awaited the attack. Clear and distinct sounded the Americall bugles through the autumn wood, and inl a few moments the enemy came into view. As soon as Harrison caught sight of the British' formation he halted his troops, and spurred his horse forward to consuit with Colonel J ohnson, one of his cavalry leaders. It wa5 quickly decided to break through the British line with cavalry. Only one cavalry battaliofl, however, could manoeuvre between the river and the swamp; but Johnson was to lead another in person across the swamp againSt the Indians. The order to charge was givelle and the American horsemen swept towards the British position. A loud musketry volley rang out along the first scarlet line, and! the cavalry advance was checked for the moment. Horses reared and plunged, and many of the riders were thrown from their saddles. Thue British delivered a second volley before the Americans recovere'! from their confusion.' But then, through the white, whirling smoICe, sounded the thunder of trampling hoOfs' With resistless force the American horsenleO dashed against the opposing ranks and fireô their pistols with telling effect. The is TECUMSEH 148",
         "TECUMSEH'S LAST FIGHT 149 line of the British scattered in headlong flight, seeking shelter behind the reserves. The second line stood firm and delivered a Steady fire ; but the men of the first line Were thrown into such disorder by the sudden attack that they could not be rallied. The Arnericans followed up their first charge and Pressed hard upon the exhausted British, for whom there was now no alternative but tO surrender. Those not killed were taken Prisoners, with the exception of about fifty Who effected their escape through the woods. Procter and his staff had taken flight at the fIrst sight of the enemy. Behind the swamp, where the Indians were POsted, the battie went no more favourably. lecumseh and bis warriors had lain sulent Iii their covert until Johnson's cavalry had aldvanced well within range. Then the leader's 10uc1 war-cry rang out as the signal for battie. The enemy shouted a derisive challenge, and the Indians replied with a well-directed volley. SID destructive was the fire of the Indians that the front line of the Americans was 'Innihilated. The horses were struggling in t'le Swamp, and Johnson, himself wounded, Ordered some of the horsemen to dismount, h1OPing to draw their foe out of cover, while",
         "150 TECUMSEH he and a few of the boldest soldiers led the attack. Tecumseh's keen eye singled out the American leader. He rushed througll his warriors to strike him down. Johnsonl levelled bis pistol. Like lightning Tecumseh's tomahawk gleamed above his head. But before it could whirl on its deadly flight, there was a flash and a report. johnsolit weakened by the wound he had already received, but stili clutching the smoking weapon, reeled from his saddle. Tecumseh'Sç tomahawk dropped harmless to the earth, and the noblest of red patriots, the greatest and truest of Indian allies, fell shot througll the breast. The Indians lost heart anid fled into the depths of the forest, leaving many of their bravest warriors dead on the field. Sunset faded into darkness. The body Of Tecumseh lay on the battlefield in the liglit of the American camp-fires. Like spectre-4 his faithful followers stole swiftly through thle wood and bore it away. On the dead face still lingered the impress of the proud spirit which had animated it in life. But sulent We~ the war-cry that had urged his followers tO battle ; stilled was the silver eloquence t1ISt had won them to his purpose. 150",
         "TECUMSEH'S LAST FIGHT z51 Tecumseh was no more; but bis memory Was cherished by the race for whose freedom he had so valiantly fought. In the light of the camp-fire his courageous deeds were long ex- toile d by warriors and handed down by the sachems of bis people. Many an ambitious brave feit bis heart Ieap as he listened-ike Tecumseh when as a boy he drank in the Storjes of the heroic deeds of his ancestors. The white men respected Tecumseh as the Indians revered Brock. But how different the obsequies of the two heroes 1 For Brock flags floated at half-mast. He was borne to the grave to the sound of martial music, fol- Iowed by a sorrowing multitude. His valour Was the thenie of orators. A stately monu- Mlent perpetuates bis memory and attracts Pilgrims to bis burial-place. The red hero fell fighting for the sanie fiag-figbting on, though deserted by a British general in the hour of direst need. But no flag drooped lier crinison folds for bum. A few followers buried bum stealthily by the light of a flicker- ItIg torch. No funeral oration was uttered as lie was lowered to his last resting-place. Night 8ilently spread ber pal; softly the autunn leaves covered the spot, and the wind chanted Il miournful requiem over his lonely grave.",
         "152 TECUMSEH No towering column directs the traveller to Tecumseh's burial-place; not; even an Indian totem-post marks the spot. The red man's secret is jealously guarded and to no white man has it ever been revealed.",
         "BIBLIOGRAPHICAL NOTE THiE principal books dealîng with Tecumseh are brake's Liue of Tecumseh, Eggleston's Tecumseh and the S9ha wnee Prophet, and The Story of Tecumseh, by Norman S. Gurd. The last men- tioned is a vividly written, interesting book. The following general books on the Indians Contain short sketches of, or reference to, the Subject of this story: Thatcher's Indian Biography; Drake's Indians of North America; Hodge's tfand- book of American Indians; White's Jlandbook of Indians of Canada (based on Hodge); Roosevelt's Winnjrng of the West; Trumbuli's indian Wars; ]Brownell's The Indian Races of North and South America; and Tupper's Lufe and Correspondence of Sir Isaac Brock. Ail works dealing with the War of 1812 con- tain matter essential to the student of the career 0f Tecumseh. Chief among these are: David Thompson's War of 1812; Richardson's War of 1812 (the edition edited by A. C. Casselman (i902\u003e cOntains many valu able notes); Coffin's 1812: The Wafr and lts Moral; a Canadian Chronicle; Auch- itileck's fflstory of the War; Hanriay's War of 1812; Lucas's Canadian War of 1812; Roosevelt's",
         "154 TECUMSEH Naval War of 1812; and Adams's tflstory of the UnitedStates during the Administration of Jefferson and Madison. The life and character of Tecumseh have fornied the subject of three somewhat ambitious poems: Richardson's Tecumseh; Jones's Tecumseh, a tragedy in five acts; and Mair's Tecumseh, a drama.",
         "INDEX Algonquins, tribal branches of, 1-2. Amnericans, their relations with the Indians, 21-2, 34, 37, 41, U ,62, 63, 66, 76, 84. See Uni ted States. Anxherstbur, 87; meeting of Br rkai Tecumseh at, 99- 104; bard times at, 125, 126; evacuated and destroyed, 139- 140, Arnold's Milis, British gun- boats captured at, 144. 13ald Eagle, a Delaware sa- chem, il. Barclay, Ca ptain Robert, bis blockade ofthe American fleet Under Perry, X24-5 ; wounded and defeated in battie of Lake Erie, 1265-33, 137. Blacl Turkey, a brave with Tecumseh, 37. Blue Jacket, a Sbawnee chief, 35, 36, 14o; yoices the senti- ments cf bis people, 55-8, B59. 01is Blanc Island, Tecumseh's warriors encamped at, 87, 92, 98, 122, 125. Bouquet, Colonel, and the Brant, josephi, the Mohawk Chief, 1. British, the, and the Indians, 56, 57, 64, 65, 85-6; an alli- ance, 68-9, 73, 83. Brock, Sir Isaac, go, ii0; bis reply te Hull's proclamation, 91 ; bis meeting with Tecum- seh, 99-,05, 108, 151 ; bis cap- ture cf Fort Detroit, 103-73; bis praise of the Indians, io8- log. Brownstown, Tecumseh's amn- buscade near, 92-$. Butler, General, killed at fray on tbe Wabash, 36. Canada, bier position at the beginning of the War cf 1812, 89-90; bier navy on Lake Erie, 124. Cheeseekau, Tecnmseh's eldest brother, 4, 16-18, 24e 27-30; bis death, 31, 145. Cherokees, the, 8, 30-1. Chillicothe, 12, 21 ; council with Indians at, 59, 61-3. Chippewas, the, 41, 55 Clark, Colonel George Rogers, îo, 17; bis Indian raid, 21-2. CaGeneral Green, reinforces H'arrison at Fort Meigs, i x6- 117. Cornstalk, a Shawnee sachemn, 11-14. Cresap, Colonel Michael, 9, 15. 155",
         "156 TECUMSEH Croghan Maor, holds Fort Glegg, Captain, his portrait of Stephensonagainst British, Tecumseh, ioo-i ; with Brock zzz-2. at Detroit, 105, 107. Great Britain, and the Indiasi, Delawares, the, 8, X3, 41, 44, 7, 16-17, 21. See British. 50, 51. Greenville, treaty Of, 44,53-4; re- Detroit, the surrender of, 103, ligious gatherin g at, 5-5, 6z. zoý-8 - abandoned by the Britishi, 140. Hardin, Colonel, defeated bl Dudley, Colonel, tomahawked the Indians, 34-5. in Indian ambuscade, 117. Harmar, General, defeated at Dunmore, Earl of, governor cf Pine Creek, 34-5, 78. Virginia, 9; his expedition Harrison, W. H., governor Of against the Indians, 12; his Indiana, bis relations with the Indian treaty of peace, 14-16. Indians, 51, 64, 67; and Tecumseh, 69-70, 71-4, 83, Elliott, Col. Matthew, super- 84-6; destroys Tippecanoe, intendent cf Indian Affairs, M68; commands American 87 resents Tecumseh ta olrces in War cf x812, i10-119 Er1cki, 99-zoo; at Detroit, i20, 123; holds Fort Meigs zo6. against the British, zîô-19; in pursuit cf Procter, 140-5; Fallen Timbers, battle cf the, victorjous at MoraviantowalI 42-4,111I. 148-qO. Fort Defiance, 4.1, Ili. Hull, General William, his pro- Fort Detroit. See Detroit. test against the use cf lu' Fort Mackinaw, fail cf, 93. dians in War cf z8îz, 90-1 ; Fort Malden, Brock at, 98, 99, at Detroit, 94, Z02; surreil- 104, 140- ders to Brcck, 107-8. Fort Meigs, siege cf, 115-19. Fort Recovery, an Indian raid Indians, three great, 1 ; griev, at, 9-40. ances cf, 7-10, 15-16; raid Fort Stanwix, treaty cf, 7. American settiements, 8, 9# Fort Stephenson, siege cf, 121-2. 17, 21, 76, 83; suPerstfitOfl0 Fort Wayne, 85; treaty cf, 67, cf, 31, 46, 8o-2; oratcryo c 71. their relations with Fren, Frenchtown, capturedbyAmeri- British, and Americans, 56-7, Cans, 112; battle cf, 112- 68, 76; in the War of 1812, lis. 90-x, 93; in praise of, log, 115- Gibson, Colonel, and Logan, Ioways, the, 13. the Mingo chief, î5-î6. Jchnson, Colonel, 141; wounded Girty, Simon, a 'white rene- in battie cf Moraviantowno gade,' 21. 148-9; his fatal shot, 150.",
         "INDEX kenton, Simon, bis encouniters with Tecumseh, 37-9. ICickapoos, the, 50, 65, 71,86. Lake Erie, battie of, 127-33. Laulewasjkaw, Tecumseb' s brother, 4 ; as the 1 Prophet ' Co-operates with Tecumseh ini an I ndian confederacy, 46- 48. See Tenskwatawa.. Lewis, General Andrew, in command at battie of Point Pleasant, 12-13. Lewis, Colonel, taken prisoner by the British at Frenchtown, Little Turtie, a Miami chief, 31,36, 41, 44. Lloyd, Captain, bis description iTlecumseh, 70-1. LoKan, a Mingo chief, ir ; bis fraendship for the whites, x5- 16. M«Clelland, Robert, bis en- counter with Tecumseh, 37. Macdonell, Lieut. -Col., with Brock at Detroit, z05, 107. Maguaga, battie of, 94-8. Mandans, the, 29-30. Methoataske, Tecuinseh's fllother, 3, 6, 17. Miatriis, the, 4', Miller, Colone1l James, Ameni- Can leader at Maguaga, 94- 98. Mingoes, the, 8, 13. Mississineýwa, counicil of, 84-5. Mohicans, the, 8. Moraviantown, battle of, 146- Mur Major, British leader at Maguaga, 94-8; at Fort Meigs, 117. Ohio, governor of, and the Indians, 55, 61-2. Ottawas, the, 41, 44, 49. Panther, an Indian chief, 59, 6x. Pennsylvania, and the Indians, 9. Perry, Captain Oliver, defeats the British on Lake Erie, 123, 127-33; in1 conjunction with Harrison, 140-1. Pine Creek, battle cf, 3t5, 78. Piqua, Tecumseh's biirthplace, 3p M6, 2o; destroyed, 2i-3; rebuilt on the Great Miami, PointPlasant, Indians de- feated at, 12-13- Pontiac, the Ottawa chief, z, 45. Potawatomis, the, 41, 44, 55, 65, 74, 85 94. Procter, g~eneral, 110 126; defeats Americans at drench- town, 112-i5; bis failures at Fort Meigs, ii5-19, 12o-z ; andat Fort Stephenson, 121-2; and Tecumseh's appeal, 133- 137; retreats from Amherst- burg after British defeat on Lake Erie, 139-45; taices to flight at Moraviantown, 146. 149; bis bad generalsbip, 138, 140, 146. Puckeshinwau, Tecumseh's father, 3, 6, xi ; killed, 13. Reynolds, Major, bis retreat from Frenchtown, xii-i2. Roundhead, a Wyandot chief, 59 6 ; honoured by Tecum.",
         "TECUMSEH St Clair, General, defeated in fray on the Wabash, 36, 39. Sauwaseekau, Tecumseh's brother, 4; his death, 43. Scott, Major -General, with Wayne's Indian expedition, 41. Senecas, the, 41, 49. Shaubena, a Potawatomj chief, 94,I 145 16. Shawnees,an Algonquini tribe, 1-2,; their feuds with the whites, 8, 1o-11, 13, 41, 44, 55, 70-1, 73; their village, 22-4; join the British ini War of î81, 87. See Indians and Tecumseh. Shelby, Major, lled near Fort SMexgs, 117. Sîver Heels, a Shawnee chief, 'II Six Nations, the, 7. Tecumapease, Tecumseh's sister, 4, 5, 6. Tecumseh, his birth, parent- age, and infancy, 1-5; early training, i8-19, 2o, 23; his initiation as a warrior, .24-7, 98-9;. with Party of Shaw- nees in search of adventure, 27-9; his tbîgh broken while hunting buffalo, 29-30;' suc- ceeds to the leadership on death of Cheeseekau, 30-3; present at defeat of General St Clair, 36 ; his encounters with Simon Kenton, 37-9 ; at the battie of the Fallen Timbers, 42-3; disputes the validity of the Treaty of Greenville, 44, 53-4, 62; bis plan of an Indian confederacy, 45-6, 55, 59, 68, 74, 75-6, 77,; attends council at Chillicothe, 59 ,12 and at Springfield, 62-3 ;bi headquarters at Tippecanoe, 65; receives encouragement from the British in his plans, 69, 83, 85-6 ; at councils with Gover- nor Harrison at Vincennes, 70-3, 74 ; his plans of ai' Indian confederacy crushed at Tippecanoe, 82-3, 85, 138; refuses to go to Wash- ington unatterided, 83 -4 attends council at Missis- sinewa, 84-5; pledges bis allegiance to Britain, 87-8; bis successful ambuscade at Brownstown, 92-3; at battie of Mag:uaga, 94-8; bis meet- ing wîth %rock, z00-5, Io\u0026 109 ; at the takin87 of Detroit, 106-8; seeks Indian recruits, Meis, il 6-19,1î0o-î; and Fort Stephenson, 12i-2; bis interest ini the battle of La e Erie, 125-6, 133 ; bis appe5 to Procter to hold out at AmiherstburçK, 134-7,1 I aî bis forebodings on Îe8,IV9; Amherstburg, 138, 140; urges Procter to make a stand, 141, 14.2-3; wounded while cover- ing the retreat, 144; bis pre- sentiment of deatb, 145-6 ; en- courages Procterbefore battle of Moraviantown, 147; bis death and resting-place, 149- 152 ; bis renown, i5z ; bis appearance, 71, 100-1' 105; bis powers of oratory, 60-3, 72, 134-7 ; bis character, 32-3v 60-3, 71, 119-20, 142. Tenskwatawa, the ,'Opeil 158",
         "INDEX Door,' 48, 54-5 ; his teaching, 49-50, 58-9, 66-7; gives con- Yîncing proof of his authority, pi-3; bis power and popu- larity 49, 54-5, 62, 63, 66; and 4lovernor Harrison, 64- 65, 66-7, 69-70, 73, 8o ; his in- fluence shattered at Tippe- canoe, 75-6, 78-82. See Laulewasikaw. Thirteen Colonies, 89. See United States. Tippecanoe, Tecumseh's head- quarters, 65-6, 68 ; destroyed, 77-82, 85. UJnited States, and the Indians, 7-16, 21-3, 34, 44, 53, 54, 55, 68, 23, 76, 86 ; declare war on Britain, 89-90; their navy on Lake Erie, 123. See Americans. Vau Horne, Major, defeated by 159 Tecumseh i an ambuscade, 92-3. Vincennes, 17; council of, 71. Virginia, and the Indians, 7-10, 12-13. Wabash river, Indian victory on the, 36. War of 1812, inevitable, 68, 70, 86; declaration of, 88-9. Warburton, Procter's second- in-command, 143. Wayne, General Anthony, his Indian expedition, 39-41 ; de- feats Indians at the Fallen Timbers and concludes a peace, 42-4, III. Wells, Captain, United States Indian agent, 53, 54. Winchester, General, occupies Frenchtown, 112; surprised and taken prisoner, 114-15. Winnebagoes, the, 82, 86. Wyandots, the, 44, 49, 55, 56, 68. Printed by T. and A. Constable, Printers to His Majesty at the Edinburgh University Press",
         "CHRONICLES 0F CANADA Edited by George M. Wrong and H. H. Langton of the University of Toronto A series of thirty-two tersely-written narratives for Popular reading, designed to set forth, in historic con- tinuity, the principal events and movements in Canada, froin the Earljest Explorers to the Railway Builders. PART 1. THE FIRST EUROPEAN VISITORS i. The Dawn of Canadian History A Chronicle of Aboriginal Canada BY STEPHEN LEACOCK 2.The Mariner of St Malo A Chronicle of the Voyages of Jacques Cartier BY STEPHEN LEACOCC PART il. THE RISE 0F NEW FRANCE .3. The Founder of New France A Chironicle of Chamnplain BY CHARLES W. COLBY 4. The Jesuit Missions A Chronicle of the Cross i the Wilderness BY THOMAS GUTH RIE MARQUIS 5. The Seigneurs of Old Canada A Chronicle of New-World Feudalisrn BY WILLIAM BENNETT MUNRO 6.The Great Intendant A Chronicle of jean Talon IBY THO MAS CHAPAIS 7. The Fighting Governor* A Chronicle of Frontenac BY CHARLES W. COLBY",
         "Chronicles of Canada PART III. THE ENGLISH INVASION 8. The Great Fortress A Chronicie of Louisbourg BY WILLIAM WOOD 9. The Acadian Exiles * A Chronicle of the ' Land of Evangeline' BY ARTHUR G. DOUGHTY io. The Passing of New France A Chronicle of Montcalm BY WILLIAM WOOD ii. The Winning of Canada A Chronicle cf Wolfe BY WILLIAM WOOD PART IV. THE BEGINNINGS 0F BRITISH CANADA 12. The Fat her of .British Canada* A Chronicle cf Carleton BY WILLIAM WOOD 13. The United Empire Loyalists A Chronicle of the Great Migration BY W. STEWART WALLACE 14. The War with the United States A Chronicle of 1812 BT WILLIAM WOOD PART V. THE RED MAN IN CANADA 15. The War Chie! of the Ottawas A Chronicle of the Pontiac War BY THOMAS GUTHRIE MARQUIS 16. The War Chief of the Six Nations A Chronicle cf joseph Brant BY LOUIS AUBREY WOOD 17. Tecumseh A Chronicle cf the last Great Leader of his People BT ETHEL T. RAYMOND",
         "Chranicles of Canada PART VI. PIONEERS OF THE NORTH AND WEST 18. The 1 Adventurers of En gland' on Hudson Bay A Chronicle of the Fur Trade in the North BY AGNES C. LAUT i9. Pathfinders of the Great Plains A Chronicle of La Vérendrye and his Sons BY LAWRENCE J. BURPEE 20. Adventurers of the Far North A Chronicle of the Arctic Seas BT STEPHEN LEACOCK 21. The Red River Colony A Chronicle of the Beginnings of Manitoba BT LOUIS AUBRET WOOD 22. Pioneers of the Paciflc Coast A Chronicle of Sea Rovers and Fur Hunters IBT AUNES C. LAUT 23. The Cariboo Trait * A Chronicle of the Settienient of British Columibia BY AUNES C. LAUT PART VII. THE STRUGGLE FOR POLITICAL FREEDOM 24. The Family Compact A Chronicle of the Rebeflion in Upper Canada BT W. STEWART WALLACE 25. The Patriotes Of '37* A Chronicle of the Rebellion in Lower Canada BT ALFRED D. DECELLES 26. The Tribune of Nova Scotia A Chronicle of joseph Hawe BT WILLIAM LAWSON GRANT 27. The Winning of Popular Government* A Chronicle of Lord Durhami and bis Successors BT ARCHIBALD MACMECHAN",
         "Chronicles of Canada PART VIII. THE GROWTH 0F NATIONALITy 28. The Fat hers of Confederation* A Chronicle of the Birth of the Dominion BY A. H. U. COLQUHOUN 29. The Day of Sir John Macdonald A Chronicle of the Early Years of the Dominion B'? SIR JOSEPH POPE 3o. The Day of Sir Wilfrid Laurier* A Chronicle of Our Own Times B'? OSCAR D. SKELTON PART IX. NATIONAL HIGHWAYS 3 1. Ail Afloat A Chronicle of Craft and Waterways B'? WILLIAM WOOD 32. The Railway Builders A Chronicle of Overland Highways B'? OSCAR D. SKELTON *NOTE-The eight volumes marlced with an asterisk are still in pýreparation and subject to changes ini authorship should unforeacen circulnstances prevent any author from completing his manuscript. Published by Glasgow, Brook \u0026 Company at 15 Wilton Avenue TORONTO, CANADA"
      ]
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.83542/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.80425/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "doc" : {
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.80425",
      "label" : "A chaplet of years",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.80425",
      "published" : [
         "Victoria, B.C. : Colonist Print. and Pub., [1918?]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Title from title screen.",
         "106, [3] p. : ill., ports. ; 27 cm."
      ],
      "creator" : [
         "Sisters of Saint Anne."
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
